A. EXTERNAL BORDERS 
1. Please provide information on legislation and other rules governing the area of border management in your country The border management in the Republic of Macedonia is regulated by several laws and by-laws.  According to the provisions of the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 19/95, 55/97, 38/02, 33/03 and 19/04), one of the responsibilities of the Ministry of the Interior is the protection of the state border, control of state border crossing and stay in the border area. The function of protection of the state border, detection and resolving of border incidents and other violations of the state border, as well as other responsibilities established by law are performed by the Border Police. The Rulebook on the Mode of Operation of the Ministry of the Interior (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”,  Nos. 12/98 and 15/03), prescribes the control of the state border crossing and control of the movement and stay in the border zone and at the border crossing points. The regime of the state border crossing, the movement and stay in the border zone and measures needed to secure the state border are governed by the Law on Crossing the State Border and Movement in the Border Zone (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 36/92, 66/92, 12/93, 15/93, 31/93, 11/94 and 19/04). In the Republic of Macedonia, the process of transfer of responsibility for securing the state border from the Ministry of Defence to the Ministry of the Interior is currently underway. Until now the responsibility for protection of the state border, control of the state border crossing and stay in the border zone at the border with the Republic of Greece and Republic of Bulgaria as well as in a part of the border with the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro (towards Serbia) have been transferred to the Ministry of the Interior, i.e. Department of Border Police.  In accordance with the Law on Crossing the State Border and Movement in the Border Zone (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”,  Nos. 36/92, 66/92, 12/93, 15/93, 31/93, 11/94 and 19/04), and the National Strategy on Integrated Border Management, the timeframe and target dates for the transfer of responsibility for securing the state border, were established as follows: from 01.05.2004 - the border with the Republic of Greece, from 01.11.2004 - the border with the Republic of Bulgaria, from 01.05.2005  - the border with Serbia and Montenegro and from November 01.11.2005 - the border with the Republic of Albania. The securing of the state border and control of the movement and stay of persons inside the border zone outside settlements and border crossing points, as well as the prevention of illegal crossings of the state border and violation of the border line at a part of the border with Serbia and Montenegro and at the border with the Republic of Albania, is in the moment within the responsibility of the Army of the Republic of Macedonia. However, the control of the state border crossing and the control of the movement and stay in the border zone also at this part of the border are performed by the Ministry of the Interior. The Ministry of Defence and the Army of the Republic of Macedonia perform the duties within their authority, according to the Law on Defence (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 42/01 and 5/03) and the Rules on the Border Service.  The Rulebook on the Mode of Detection and Resolving of Border Incidents and Other Violations of the State Border (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 78/92), proscribes the manner of detection and resolving of border incidents and other violations of the state border and the manner of maintaining records on border incidents and other violations of the state border.  The Rulebook on the Mode of Control of Crossing of the State Border, Movement and Stay at the Border Crossing Points and on Maintaining Records (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 74/92), establishes the manner of: performance of control of the state border crossings; transfer of weapons and ammunition across the state border; movement and stay at the border crossing points; maintaining records on control of the state border crossing, issued permits on movement and stay inside the border zone, issued permits for settlement in the border zone and on the forms of the permits for movement and stay at the border crossing points; movement and stay outside the location of the border crossing points and movement and stay inside the borderland.  The Rulebook on Areas and Facilities Comprising the Border Crossing Points (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 69/92 and 9/97), regulates issues of areas and regions comprising the border crossing points.  The Rulebook on Movement, Stay, Settlement and Hunting and Fishing Regime Inside the Border Zone (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 78/92), governs the issue of movement, stay, settlement and hunting and fishing regime inside the border zone.  The Rulebook on the Delineation Markings on the Border Zone at Land (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 26/95), prescribes the shape, colour, dimensions, contents and location of the delineation markings on the border zone at land.   According to the Customs Administration Law (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/04), the Customs Administration is directly responsible to undertake and perform: customs surveillance and control; customs clearance of goods; and investigative and intelligence measures for prevention, detection and investigation of customs offences and criminal offences.  Within the border management, the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Resources Management has three basic functions: phytosanitary control, veterinary control, and control of forests and felling of forests, which are performed according to the provisions of the Plant Protection Law (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 25/98 and 6/00), Law on Seeds, Seedlings and Propagating Material and Sort Recognition, Approval and Protection (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 41/00), Law on Animal Husbandry (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 61/97), Law on Agricultural Inspection (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 38/2004), Rulebook on Health Control of Plants in Transport Across the State Border (“Official Gazette of SFRY”, No. 59/91), Rulebook on Mandatory Health Inspection of Crops and Objects, of Seeds and Planting Material of Agricultural and Forestry Plants  (“Official Gazette of SFRY”, No. 52/86) and Order on Determining Quarantine when importing propagating material of multi-annual plants (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 81/2003). In the area of border management, the Ministry of Health applies the provisions of the Law on Safety of Foodstuff and of Products and Materials in Contact with Foodstuffs (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 54/02), Law on Protection and Safety from lonising Radiation  (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 48/02), Law on Protection of the Population from Contagious Diseases (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No.66/04), Law on Precursors (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 37/04), Law on Transport of Hazardous Material (“Official Gazette of SFRY”, Nos. 27/90 and 45/90 and ”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 12/93 and 31/93) and Law on Trade in Poisons (“Official Gazette of SFRY”, No. 13/91). Within the system of border management, the segment of planning of border crossing points, i.e. the issue of development of urban planning projects on border crossing points is regulated with the provisions of the Law on Spatial and Urban Planning (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 4/96, 28/97, 18/99, 53/01 and 45/02). Drafting of the Law on State Border Monitoring, which will regulate the issues of monitoring of the state border, the responsibilities of the Border Police and cross-Border Police cooperation is currently underway. 
2. Please provide an overview of your activities to implement the measures that were adopted by the Government as a follow-up to the Ohrid Conference on border security and management and presented at the EU-Western Balkans JHA ministerial meeting of 28 November 2003 In line with the obligations undertaken with the joint platform adopted at the Ohrid Conference on Border Security and Management and the Way Forward Document, the competent authorities of the Republic of Macedonia have realised the following activities:   Adoption of the Strategy on Integrated Border Management;    Amending and approximation of the legislation in the area of border management;   Transfer of state border security to the Ministry of the Interior;   Establishment of Border Police within the Ministry of the Interior;   Development of a cross-border cooperation with the neighbouring countries;   Designing of an IT system;   Procedure for issuing of new travel and other identification documents with security features in line with the European standards. 
Strategy on Integrated Border Management The Government of the Republic of Macedonia on 17.03.2003 established an Inter-Ministerial Working Group to manage the Integrated Border Management Project. The group is entrusted to monitor the entire process from development of National Strategy on Integrated Border Management to complete implementation of this concept, scheduled for the end of 2005.   The abovementioned Inter-Ministerial Working Group, is coordinated by the Ministry of the Interior and includes of representatives from the Ministry of Defence, Ministry of Education and Science, Ministry of Foreign Affairs, Ministry of Finance – Customs Administration, Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Resources Management, Ministry of Health, Ministry of Transport and Communications and Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning. The group drafted the National Strategy on Integrated Border Management, which was adopted on 22.03.2003 by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. In order to implement the Strategy, a National Action Plan on Integrated Border Management is in the final stage of development. This Action Plan clearly defines the specific activities which have to be undertaken, the timeframe for their implementation, the performance indicators, the responsible ministries or agencies, the necessary resources and the potential risks and conditionalities.  Amendments and harmonisation of the legislation in the area of border management On 24.03.2004, the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia adopted the Law Amending the Law on Internal Affairs, (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 19/2004) and the Law Amending the Law on Crossing of the State Border and Movement In the Border Zone (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 19/2004). The amendments to these laws created a legal basis for establishing the Border Police and for transfer of competencies for securing the state border from the Ministry of Defence to the Ministry of  Interior. Moreover, a draft version of the new Law on State Border Surveillance was drafted, which precisely defines the competencies and powers in the surveillance of the state border, delineation of the state border, stay and movement inside the border zone, crossing of the state border and at border crossing points, border control, inland  border police activities, international cooperation and collecting of personal data and records. 


Takeover of the state border security by the Ministry of the Interior In order to create preconditions for transfer of competencies for securing the state border, in July 2003 an inter-ministerial working group between the Ministry of the Interior and the Ministry of Defence was established. This Group was supported by five working sub-groups, which were assigned with the preparation of a Project on Establishing the Border Police. The basic objective of the project was to give an overview of the current situation regarding the equipment and personnel that have to be transferred to the Ministry of the Interior and to perform an analysis and needs assessment of the border police in the period between 2004 and 2005. The working group completed its task in January 2004, when the prepared project was accepted by the Ministry of the Interior and the Ministry of Defence. In the course of 2004 the training of the personnel to be transferred from the Ministry of Defence to the Ministry of the Interior commenced. Three courses have been completed thus far (from 02.02.2004 to 30.04.2004, from 10.05.2004 to 06.08.2004 and from 13.09.2004 to 10.12.2004) and a total of 821 candidates were trained. The training is performed in the Police Academy with participation of OSCE experts. The candidates who graduated thus far are deployed at the border. In line with the National Strategy on Integrated Border Management on 01.05.2004, the process of transferring the competencies for securing the state border commenced. Thus far, the securing of the state border with Republic of Greece, Republic of Bulgaria and in a part of the state border with the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro (towards Serbia) was transferred to the Ministry of the Interior.  Establishing of the Border Police within the Ministry of the Interior By undertaking the competencies for securing the state border with the Republic of Greece on 01.05.2004, within the Ministry of the Interior the process of establishing the Border Police Department (which de jure exists from 27.04.2004) commenced. As a single structure within the Ministry of the Interior its competencies are the control of crossing the state border and surveillance and control of the state border. From an organisational aspect, the Border Police is a Department within the Bureau for Public Security. Thus far, besides the operational start of the Border Police Department which undertakes activities on central level, the Regional Centre South responsible for securing and control of the border with Republic of Greece and the Regional Centre East responsible for securing and control of the border with Republic of Bulgaria also commenced with operational activities. In this moment the Project on Building a Facility for the Headquarters of the Border Police Department and the Project on Purchase of Motor Vehicles for the Needs of the Border Police are underway. The complete implementation of these projects is expected in 2005. Development of cross-border cooperation with the neighbouring states The co-operation with the border services of the neighbouring countries has been constantly  improving:   With the Republic of Greece there is an already established practice to hold regular meetings between the services directly involved in securing the state border and at the same time a link for exchange of information regarding the border security was established;   With the Republic of Bulgaria liaison officers are appointed to exchange information on local, regional and central level;   With the Republic of Albania the implementation of the project for enhancing the border cooperation between Macedonia and Albania is underway. With this project, besides the already established practice of holding meetings on local, regional and central level, there is an ongoing training of border service officers from both countries regarding the introduction with the legislation of the neighbouring country;   With the Interim Administration of the United Nations in Kosovo  liaison officers were assigned to exchange information related to border security. For more details see answer 24_A_19

Building of an IT system Aiming at raising of the level of operational power of the Border Police, there are ongoing activities for further upgrading of the existing IT system. In this context, the following two projects are underway:   Project on building and enhancing the telecommunication structure: this project foresees an establishment of a telecommunication network between the border crossing points and the headquarters of the Ministry of the Interior thus enabling a transfer of data from the border crossing points to the central database, and vice versa;    Project on Development of IT system on Integrated Border Management (software on border operation). The project foresees development of appropriate software which will enable centralised collection, processing and distribution of data related to border operation. 
Issuing of new travel and other documents for identification with security features in accordance with the European standards The public procurement procedure for new travel and other identification documents is underway. Thus so far, the first qualification stage was completed. In the course of 2005 a contract is expected to be signed and the issuance of the new documents will commence. The new documents will correspond to the European standards, and will contain biometric data, laser photograph engraving and other data on the holder of the document, as well as high quality security features which will significantly reduce the possibility of their counterfeiting.  3. Does an overall border management strategy exist in your country? If so, describe the main components of your border management strategy and its stage of implementation According to a Governmental Conclusion from 17.03.2003, an Inter-Ministerial Working Group for managing the project on “Integrated Border Management”, was established. The working group was commisioned with the task to monitor the entire process, from development of the National Strategy on Integrated Border Management, to full implementation of this concept, whereby the end of 2005 was set as a deadline. This group is coordinated by the Ministry of the Interior and comprised of representatives from the Ministry of Defence, Ministry of Education and Science, Ministry of Foreign Affairs, Ministry of Finance – Customs Administration, Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Resources Management, Ministry of Health, Ministry of Transport and Communications and Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning. In the course of its activities, it has finalised the National Strategy on Integrated Border management that was adopted on 22.12.2003 by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. The National strategy was developed in accordance with the specific circumstances of the social, political and legal system of the Republic of Macedonia, taking also into consideration the comparative experiences from other countries all relevant international instruments, the legislation of the EU Member-states and EU candidate countries and the recommendations from the Schengen Catalogue of best practices.  The main objectives of the National strategy are as follows:   Establishing  of open, but controlled and secure borders in accordance with the European standards, through facilitated and accelerated crossing of the borders for legitimate purposes and at the same time identification, detection, prevention, suppression and dealing with illegal and enemy movements, and especially dealing with cross-border activities that are supported by organised crime and endanger the regional security (trafficking in arms, human beings and narcotics);   Transferring the responsibilities for border management from the Army of the Republic of Macedonia to the Ministry of the Interior by 31.12.2005;   Establishing of a new Border Police Department, within the Ministry of the Interior, as a basic state body for border management in the country, that will undertake the responsibility for monitoring the state border  by 31.12.2005;   Establishing of a National Coordination Centre for Border Management, which will be managed by the Border Police Department in cooperation with all state bodies involved in the  border management, in order to achieve cooperation, coordination, mutual support and exchange of information;   Strengthening of the cross-border cooperation by signing  international agreements on cross-border cooperation with the neighbouring and other European countries and simultaneous exchange of liaison officers with the border services of the neighbouring countries. The main components of the National strategy are:   Description of the state border of Republic of Macedonia – history, neighbouring countries, existing border crossing points for road, railway and air traffic, geographic delineation of the border with topography and border economy, i.e.  main economic activities of the population that live in the border regions;   Strategic challenges, i.e. potential types of threats – conventional military attack, possibility of invasion of enemy groups and individuals, internal conflict and crime;   Legal affairs - Development of primary and secondary legislation in accordance with the recommendations from the Schengen Catalogue of best practices. Establishing methodology for development of legislative framework and full respect of the human rights and freedoms. Enacting a Law on Surveillance and Control of the State Border and regulation of the cooperation between the ministries and institutions involved in the border management as primarily important.    Establishing of National Border Police Service within the Ministry of the Interior and defining its needs, operational concept and competencies. Establishing of National Coordination Centre for Border Management to coordinate the activities of various state bodies involved in the border management; opening of regional centres; conducting criminal investigations; selection, recruitment and training of Border Police personnel and exchange of liaison officers with neighbouring countries;   Establishing a methodology in the process of transfer of responsibility from Border Brigade to the Border Police with timeframe and schedule and without compromising the efficiency of the border management and security of the state;   Establishing of National System of Border Monitoring for timely and precise transmission of information, as well as installing a Closed System of Video Surveillance, which enables the operational managers to receive live information that will assist them in the decision-making process;   Categorisation of the border crossing points (first, second and third category) according  to their strategic importance, in order to concentrate the resources at certain border crossing points;   Establishing and implementing Standard Operational Procedures, based on the competencies allocated to the Border Police and the Customs Administration;   Conducting inspections of commercial and other vehicles which enter or exit at the border crossing points, with profiling of the intelligence and proactive investigation;   Strengthening the activities for timely detection, prevention and elimination of attempts of illegal migration, trafficking in human beings, illegal trafficking in drugs, illegal possession and transport of radioactive substances and other harmful and hazardous substances, as well as carrying out measures aimed at prevention of spreading of contagious diseases;   Clear definition of the procedures at the Green Border;   Development of the border areas by multi-agency approach and strategy for border development.   Control of the lake border, by using inland radar control, in order to prevent illegal lake border crossings;   Development of regional cooperation and coordination at local, regional and central  level, as well as a cooperation through Mixed Border Committees;    Development of border data management system;   Passport and visa regime: introducing new travel documents of much higher quality then the existing ones, i.e., with better security features. Training of consular personnel involved in issuing visas, in order to detect falsified and modified travel documents, as well as establishing of database on issued visas;   Intelligence, analysis and dissemination of information in order to enhance the national capacity for prevention of organised cross-border crime through development of a National Intelligence Model, establishing National Border Intelligence Committee enhanced, integrated and networked analytical capacity of border management and law enforcement and intelligence;   Risk analysis – Optimisation of resources and operational management;   Data protection and databases management;   Military support to civilian authorities. The border police and the Ministry of Defence will work jointly on development of clear administrative and operational procedures for mutual support in cases of threat to the territorial integrity;    Public relations  in accordance with the principles of transparency and responsibility. Regarding the implementation stages of the Strategy for Integrated Border Management, from the moment of its adoption until now the following activities were completed: The Inter-Ministerial Working Group, with participation of expert from an EU-member state, has prepared a draft version of the Action Plan for Integrated Border Management that clearly defines the specific activities which need to be undertaken and the timeframe for their implementation, performance indicators, responsible ministries or agencies, necessary resources and potential risks and conditionalities. Changes were introduced in the legislation, that created a legal basis for establishing the Border Police. Draft versions of the Law on Surveillance of the State Border, and Law on Cooperation in the Integrated Border Management were developed. The border police was established as a special Department within the Ministry of  Interior. The activities for protection of the state border, control of crossing of the state border, detection and resolving of border incidents and other violations of the state border, and other issues determined by law are within its competencies.  In the area of security of the state border a transfer of competencies was carried out. Until now the Ministry of the Interior, i.e. the Border Police Department, has overtaken the security of the border  with  Republic of Greece and with Republic of Bulgaria. The securing of a part of the border with the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro, from the junction of the three countries (Republic of Bulgaria as the third one), to the region covered by the police station “Pelince” was also transferred to the Border Police Department. Three courses for basic police training, completed by a total of 821 candidates, who were transferred from the Ministry of Defence into the Ministry of the Interior were provided. The training was carried out by the Police Academy, with participation of experts from OSCE and it contains study of primary and secondary legislation which governs the work of the police, with a special emphasis on the regulations of border management. The graduated candidates were assigned to perform duties and tasks in the organisational units of the Border Police Department.  Activities related to implementation of two projects on building and enhancing of the telecommunications structure which will enable transfer of data from the border crossing points to the headquarters of the Ministry and vice versa, as well as centralised collection, processing and distribution of data related to border affairs are underway.  The public tendering for procurement of new travel and other identity documents is also underway. The new documents will be in line with the European standards, i.e. they will contain biometric data, laser photograph engraving and data on the document holder, as well as high quality security features that will significantly reduce the possibility of falsification. The cross-border cooperation with the neighbouring states is enhanced, whereby with the border service of Republic of Greece a practice was established of organising meetings at local, regional and national level, as well as exchange of information related to border security. With the border services of Republic of Bulgaria and UNMIK liaisons officers to exchange information in the area of border security were assigned. 4. Has a national country-wide assessment of the situation at the external borders been made and updated? What are the results? Since the independence of the Republic of Macedonia, the assessment of the situation at the external borders was performed by the Ministry of  Defence, i.e., the First Border Brigade, as a body in charge of securing the state border of the Republic of Macedonia.  The assessment is based on constant monitoring, studying and awareness of the situation in the border zone and the area on the other side of the border and is generally comprised of: a)  In a topographic-geographic sense:   Assessment of the general features of the topography in the border zone and in the border region;   Condition of the road network (including the tracks) in the border region, emphasising the sections which could represent a risk for the Border police personnel when performing the security (avalanches, landslides, steep terrains, etc.);   Locations suitable to observe the border, especially within the range of the tactical-operative directions;   Most adequate directions for use of units from the border posts under all circumstances of securing the border; b)  In a tactical – operative sense:   Deployment and capacity of the units that secure the border of the neighbouring country;   Assessments to which part of the border and in which season should be paid special attention in terms of securing the state border; c)  In terms of security:   Security assessment of the population in the border zone of the neighbouring country;   Assessment of the technical and economic entities in the border regions which could be subject of interest;   Situation assessment is updated once a year, whereby, if certain changes occur which are important for accurate assessment, it can be performed more frequently. After transferring the responsibility for securing the entire state border to the Ministry of the Interior, i.e. the Border Police Department, a new assessment of the situation at the state border will be performed, in order to assess the current situation and to define the future steps and priorities geared towards more efficient securing of the state border and development of the concept of integrated border management.  
5. Has this assessment provoked any need to adapt the allocation of resources at national level? The introduction of the system of integrated border management and the situation assessment of the external borders has caused reallocation of funds on national level.   Regarding the transfer of responsibility for security of the state border for 2004, from the budget of the Ministry of Defence a total of 113.445.000,00 MKD were allocated. The other needs were financed from the budget line of the Ministry of the Interior.  In 2004, the Ministry of the Interior spent 95.681.765,00 MKD for the operational start of the Border Police. In total, both Ministries - of Defence and Interior spent an amount of 209.126.765,00 MKD on establishing the Border Police, not taking into account the value of transferred capital assets. The capital assets (buildings, technical means for border surveillance, weapons and other equipment), by a Government decision, were transferred from the Ministry of Defence to the Ministry of the Interior. For reallocation of these assets, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia has, thus far, adopted the following decisions:   Decision on Transfer of the Right to Use Specific Immovable Property (No. 23-3922/1 of 10.09.2003)   Decision on Transfer of the Right to Use Immovable Property (Confidential No. 57/1 of 04.10.2004)   Decision on Transfer of the Right to Use and Dispose Material-Technical Means and Equipment (Confidential No. 56/1 of 04.10.2004) The aforementioned decisions precisely define the kind, type and number of transferred means and the location of the objects taken over by the Ministry of the Interior. In the Supplementary Budget for 2004, the funds for salaries and allowances for the transferred personnel, in the amount of 100.000.000,00 MKD, were transferred from the Budget of the Ministry of Defence to the Budget of the Ministry of the Interior. Starting from the 2005 Budget, there is a separate line in the Budget for the Border Police, within the Budget of the Ministry of the Interior.    A total of 670.362.000,00 MKD is allocated for the Border Police in 2005. For more details see answer 24_A_08
6. Describe the co-operation and co-ordination of duties between the government bodies responsible for border management (border control and border surveillance) The organisation, competencies and operation of State Administration Bodies is governed by the Law on Organisation and Operation of State Administration Bodies (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 58/2000 and 44/2002). According to this Law, the state administration bodies, as a part of the executive branch of the government, are established for certain areas, in order to perform relevant functions and maintain efficient enforcement of the rights and duties of citizens and legal entities. According to the Law on Crossing of the State Border and Movement In the Border Zone (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 36/92, 12/93, 11/94 and 19/2004), for harmonised performance of certain activities of common importance for several competent state bodies and enterprises in the area of controlling the state border crossing and controlling the movement and stay inside the border zone, the Minister of Interior is authorised, together with responsible state bodies and public enterprises, to establish mixed committees and other working bodies. Pursuant to Article 11- of the Law Amending the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No.19/2004), the Border Police performs the activities of protection of the state border, detection and resolving of border incidents and other violations of the state border, and other activities defined by law. As soon as transfer of the competencies for securing the state border from the Ministry of Defence to the Ministry of the Interior is completed (for more details see answer 24_A_01), the Border Police Department will have exclusive competencies in securing the state border. In performing its competencies, the Ministry of the Interior cooperates with other Ministries that have competencies in the field of border management. The cooperation with the Ministry of Foreign Affairs is carried out through regular exchange of information concerning the area of visa regime according to the Law on Movement and Stay of Aliens (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 36/92; 66/92; 26/93 and 45/2002), the Rulebook on the Mode of Issuance of Travel Documents and Visas to Aliens, and the Forms for these Documents and Visas (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 75/93) and Guidelines on the Mode of Issuance of Travel Documents and Visas for Aliens by Diplomatic and Consular Missions of the Republic of Macedonia abroad, and the Mode for Maintaining Records on Issuance of Travel Documents and Visas to Aliens  (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 10/98). This legislation defines the competencies of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs and Ministry of the Interior in the area of visa regime, mutual obligations and information flow. For more details on the regulations governing this area see answer 24_A_01.   With the Ministry of Finance – Customs Administration, the cooperation is carried out on several levels. On the level of shift leaders, the cooperation is carried out on daily basis, through exchange of information and data and agreeing to undertake certain activities. In circumstances of increased frequency of passengers and vehicles, activities to be undertaken are jointly agreed. The cooperation on the level of commander of a border crossing point and head of customs office is carried out through regular meetings, in order to exchange opinions and resolve accidents and incidents. On central level these meetings take place occasionally, as needed. In order to regulate the cooperation between the Ministry of the Interior and the Ministry of Finance, on 18.11.2004, a Memorandum for Cooperation in Prevention and Combating of Organised Crime and Other Types of Crime in the Republic of Macedonia, was signed. Based on this Memorandum, and in order to undertake specific joint activities, the Customs Administration and the Public Security Bureau have signed a Protocol for Implementation of this Memorandum. This Protocol regulates the manner and the area of cooperation, as well as the specific joint activities by the Ministry of Finance – Customs Administration and the Ministry of the Interior – Bureau for Public Security in order to combat crime on the entire territory of the Republic of Macedonia. With the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Resources Management, the cooperation and coordination take place in the performance of the veterinary and phyto-sanitary inspection. Activities are coordinated on central level and on the border crossing points (local level), through daily contacts, periodic meetings, information dissemination, provision of expert assistance, etc. The Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Resources Management regularly informs the Ministry of the Interior about the prohibition of import of certain types of goods into Republic of Macedonia. With the Ministry of Health, i.e. the State Sanitary and Health Inspectorate, the cooperation is carried out through daily performance of tasks for strengthening the control of all entities involved in transport of foodstuffs, products and materials in contact with foodstuffs, protection from ionising radiation, protection from contagious diseases, transport of precursors, hazardous materials and poisons. The cooperation with the Ministry of Defence is pursued through regular meetings on local level, where information are exchanged about the situation at the state border and about the events and indications relevant to the border security. In line with the legislation and defined competencies, joint activities and timely exchange of information are proposed and agreed in order to define and coordinate further actions of the responsible units. 
7. Do you make use of specialised trained professional staff for certain duties? The process of transferring of responsibility from the Ministry of Defence to the Ministry of the Interior for securing the state border is currently underway (for more details see 24_A_01). In order to prevent unauthorised crossings and violation of the state border where the transfer of responsibility is not finished (in a part of the North border and on the West border), the control of the state border crossing and stay in the border zone outside settlements and border crossings is still within the competencies of the Army of the Republic of Macedonia. The Army of the Republic of Macedonia is conducting this activity through appropriately trained members of the Border Brigade.   The border brigade has at its disposal special personnel from the following categories:   Officers and non-commissioned officers for management from the lowest to the highest level;   Border troops for specialised duties (patrol commanders, handlers of police dogs, drivers of utility motor vehicles, operators of optical electronic systems);   Operators of professional radar systems;    Professional communication officers and others.  The lower rank officers manage the security on the field and are directly responsible. Due to the specifics of certain situation and areas, officers whose escorts (patrol members) are comprised of soldiers and professional soldiers are appointed as patrol commanders.  The Border Brigade has at its disposal a modern radar system ASCARAT and optical electronic means for surveillance and reconnaissance, which are operated by specially trained professionals. The higher ranking officers are stationed in the headquarters of the battalions and brigades and issue commands through the state border security commanding officers and in certain situations directly. The headquarters of the battalions and brigades are comprised of headquarters (sections) divided in specialised areas (personnel section, security and intelligence section, operational section, logistic support section, section for public relations, section for communication and finance section). The officer personnel are with adequate education and have special training for certain activities within the sections.  It is compulsory to follow all the hierarchic levels in the career i.e. greater promotions are not possible. Before taking over duties and during working activities, the personnel is constantly trained through specific courses and seminars.  The Border brigade personnel is trained by NATO instructors and each of its members possesses certain military speciality.  The Border Police Department within the Ministry of the Interior is performing the control at the South and East state border. In order to be assigned on certain job position within this department, it is necessary to fulfill the prescribed conditions for performing the working assignments and tasks contained in the Rulebook for Systematisation of Working Positions.   Authorised officials working at airports perform tasks in the area of counter-diversion protection. They are trained for performing counter-diversion protection through trainings, seminars and workshops organised by the Ministry of the Interior.   The control of the state border crossing on the border crossing points is performed by authorised officials professionally trained for detecting forged travel documents. For that purpose, several courses for detecting forgeries and for fight against trafficking in human beings organised by PROXIMA Mission were held at all border crossing points.   At the border crossing points and in the Border Police stations, police dogs for detecting drugs and explosives and dogs for protection are used. More dogs for protection are used at the Border Police stations. For that reason in every station there are at least two dogs for protection with as many trained dog handlers. Authorised officers – handlers of police dogs have completed courses on handling police dogs. The police dogs for protection are re-trained in a special training centre once a year. The police dogs for detecting drugs and explosives are doing the re-training once in two months.  At the same time, training for new police dogs is continuously underway.  At the Border Police stations and on the border crossing points a special introductory programme for the newly recruited police officers and officers transferred from other organisational units is realised.  The border control of the lake waters is performed by authorised officials who are adequately trained for performing this kind of duties. There are 28 authorised officials who are operating with 6 patrol boats on the Ohrid Lake, Prespa Lake and Dojran Lake. These authorised officials passed exams at the Lake Port Authority in Ohrid and were issued certificates for boat operating.  Likewise, prior to start using any new means for work (utility motor vehicle, motorcycles, vessels, optical-electronic systems etc.) it is necessary for the authorised officials to complete basic or additional training for the purpose of his/her training for operating the means in question. For each Border Police station there are 4 qualified drivers of utility motor vehicle and 5 motorcycles drivers.  It is necessary to mention that parallel to the various trainings, in order to correctly perform the activities connected with the state border security, the implementation and compliance with the regulations, the working methodology and ethics of conduct is monitored on daily basis.   In accordance with the current legislation, the processing of legal goods and detecting the transport of illegal goods across the state border is done by specially trained members of the Customs Administration.  According to the plans and programmes of the Training Unit and the Strategic Plan of the Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia 2004 – 2008, and for the purpose of more successful performance of its tasks, specialised trainings in specific areas are planned and implemented for certain custom officers.  Customs officers performing duties at the airports are trained for using X-ray machines and are qualified for performing the tasks of protective examination of passengers and hand-luggage.  Customs inspectors - handlers of dogs, who are operating within the Mobile Team Unit, were trained in German training centres. Currently, training for dog-handlers in the Republic of Turkey is underway. Also, the customs inspectors from the Mobile Teams Unit, as well as the custom officers from the more frequent border crossing points in the course of 2004 were equipped with Vapour Tracers – electronic devices, which detect presence of drug particles through analysis of particles. They were adequately trained for use of these devices. The construction of the system for protection against illegal import of nuclear and radioactive materials in the Republic of Macedonia started in 2000, when a decision for construction of such a system in the country was made. Funds for procurement of statical radioactivity detectors for the border crossing points and hand detectors for locating the radioactive sourcewere provided from various sourcesWith the assistance of the International Atomic Energy Agency from Vienna, a project on upgrading the existing equipment with a neutron detector, video camera for registering the alarm and connecton of the two signals and their display on a video-screen was realised on one of the border crossing points. In 2002, the Customs Administration, in co-operation with this agency, organised a regional seminar in Ohrid on the topic "Illegal trafficking of nuclear and radioactive substances".   In the past period training of all custom officers working at the border crossing points was performed for the purpose of acquiring basic knowledge of the radioactivity and initial reaction in case of alarm. Three custom officers underwent a one - month training at the Russian Customs Academy in St. Petersburg.  At the moment, the Customs Administration is in possession of 22 statical radioactivity detectors, placed at 11 border crossing points. That covers all of the border crossing points where there is import of goods, with an exception of the railroad crossing points. There are also 23 hand detectors that can locate the radioactive source and measure the radiation dose. If necessary, appropriate assistance can be requested from the Unit for Radioactive Protection, within the Ministry of Health.  On two border crossing points detectors for neutron radiation are installed.  An upgrading of the remaining detectors with channels for neutron radiation and a connection of all detectors with the Customs Administration control centre in Skopje is planned in future. Respective training programmes are also foreseen.  During 2003 and 2004, training seminars for fight against proliferation of weapons of mass destruction were held. Trainings for preservation of the ozone layer and trainings for handling instruments for control of temperature fluids were also carried out.  The veterinary - sanitary inspectors are performing  the veterinary – sanitary inspection and control at the border crossing points when importing, exporting and transiting of shipments of animal origin is taking place. The inspectors are employees of  the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Resources Management (as one of the authorities competent for the border management). A veterinary inspector at a border crossing point may be a physician in the veterinarian medical sciences with passed state exam, and at least two years of experience in that field. These employees have status of civil servants and in accordance with the Law on Civil Servants (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 59/00, 112/00, 34/01, 103/01, 43/02, 98/02, 17/03, 40/03, 85/03 and 17/04) and the Law on Veterinary Health (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 28/98) undergo continuous professional specialisation and education.  Besides the above stated, the State Sanitation and Health Inspectorate, the Food Directorate, and the Drug Bureau within the Ministry of Health have special inspection units that receive continuous specialised education. The activities of these services are coordinated by responsible persons from the Customs Administration.  8. Please describe your plans to transfer of responsibility for border control from the Ministry of Defence to the Ministry of the Interior, including the relevant timetable and budgetary allocations 
The transfer of responsibility for border control from the Ministry of Defence to the Ministry of the Interior has been planned and implemented as a closely coordinated process between these two institutions, with planned duration of 2 years, in the course of 2004 and 2005. Prior to the start of the process, in the period between 2000 and 2003, preparatory measures were taken; necessary plans were developed, and legislation was drafted. Thus, the basis was formed for the transfer of responsibility from the Border Brigade of the Army of the Republic of Macedonia to the Border Police Department of the Ministry of the Interior.  In the preliminary process and in the course of development of legislation (for more details see 24_A_01), there was an extensive participation of European Union experts, whereby a part of the activities was supported by the CARDS programme. The plans and legislation for the establishment of the Border Police have been to the greatest possible extent harmonised with the EU recommendations presented in the Schengen Catalogue of best practices and with the commitments made by the Republic of Macedonia. A number of laws, secondary legislation and other documents are in drafting stage, and they  will further regulate the operation of the system of Integrated Border Management. The most important are the Law on State Border Surveillance, the Law on Police and the National Action Plan on Integrated Border Management.  In accordance with the planned schedule for transfer of responsibility for border control from the Ministry of Defence to the Ministry of the Interior, the state borders towards the Republic of Greece and the Republic of Bulgaria are already transferred to the competence of the Ministry of the Interior as follows: with the Republic of Greece on 01.05.2004 and with the Republic of Bulgaria on 01.11.2004. According to the schedule, the control of the Northern border with the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro should be transferred in 2 stages: the part towards Serbia in the first stage was already transferred in December 2004, and the part towards Kosovo - in the second stage. Coordinated preparations between the competent institutions of the Ministry of Defence and of the Ministry of the Interior for transfer of responsibility for control of the whole northern border are underway, and it should be transferred by 01.05.2005 the latest, pursuant to Article 19 of the Law Amending the Law on Crossing the State Border and Movement in the Border Zone (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 36/92, 66/92, 12/93, 15/93, 31/93, 11/94 and19/04). The responsibility for control of the state border with the Republic of Albania should be transferred not later than 01.11.2005; thus, the entire process of transfer of responsibility from the Ministry of Defence to the Ministry of the Interior will be finalised.  After the completion of this process, the Ministry of Defence, through task forces of the Army of the Republic of Macedonia, will provide support to the Border Police in conformity with the activities declared in the Strategic Defence Review.  The transfer of responsibility for border control is a complex process, which is comprised of the following basic elements: Transfer of personnel from the Ministry of Defence to the Ministry of the Interior  Personnel has been selected in close coordination between the responsible services of the Ministry of Defence and the Ministry of the Interior.  Prior to the start of the selection process, the Ministry of Defence organised a survey to identify the interest of the personnel for voluntary transfer to the Border Brigade. The selection process was based on the results of this survey. The transfer of personnel from the Ministry of Defence to the Ministry of the Interior is made on the basis of individual agreements by the three parties (the Ministry of Defence, the Ministry of the Interior and the transferred employee). Prior to the actual transfer, each candidate transferred from the Ministry of Defence undergoes basic police training at the Police Academy in duration of three months, as well as mandatory check-ups. Transfer of the experiences of the units of the Army of the Republic of Macedonia regarding the border line security, and of the Ministry of the Interior regarding the in-depth border security to the Border Police The experiences acquired by the units of the Army of the Republic of Macedonia in securing the borders are transferred through the personnel of the Border Brigade which in large part is transferred to the Border Police, and through placing at its disposal the assessments, operational plans and other documents according to which the Army of the Republic of Macedonia had performed border operations. The experiences of the personnel of the Ministry of the Interior in the new system of border control are conveyed through the transfer of a part of the Police Stations personnel that was in charge of the in-depth border line security to the Border Police units, and by placing the respective documents at their disposal.  
Transfer of equipment and part of the armament of the Ministry of Defence to the Ministry of the Interior  The entire personal and the major part of the equipment for surveillance of the state border, with which the Border Police is equipped, have been taken over from the Ministry of Defence – the Army of the Republic of Macedonia. The radio communication system and part of the transport vehicles that the Border Police uses, were transferred from the Ministry of Defence to the Ministry of the Interior on temporary basis, until the installation of the communication system of the Ministry of the Interior is completed.  The transfer of the equipment and weapons is scheduled for the entire duration of the transfer process, with careful selection according to the criteria of functionality and quality.  Transfer of facilities to the Border Police    The former facilities of the Border Brigade of the Army of the Republic of Macedonia are made available to the Border Police units. Part of these facilities, in line with the operational assessment of the Border Police, has already been transfered. A further transfer of other facilities is due to take place. Out of 7 facilities where the units of the Regional Centre South are situated, 6 are taken over from the Army of the Republic of Macedonia, while out of 5 facilities which are used at the moment by the units of the Regional Centre East, 4 are taken over from the Army of the Republic of Macedonia. Apart from the transferred facilities and equipment from the Ministry of Defence – the Army of the Republic of Macedonia, foreign donations and allocations from EU funds also had a significant role in the equipping of the Border Police. Due to this, the budgetary implications of establishing such a complex organisational entity have been reasonable. However, a greater need for capital investments is expected after the process of transfer of personnel is completed, i.e. after the establishment of all planned Border Police units. In 2004, for the transfer of responsibility for border control, the budget of the Ministry of Defence allocated a total of 113.445.000,00 MKD. The rest of the needs were financed by the budget of the Ministry of the Interior and the Ministry of Finance.  The Ministry of the Interior spent a total of 95.681.765,00 MKD for the operational start of the Border Police, allocated for the following expenditures:   Purchase of firearms (830 handguns) for the border police and corresponding ammunition – 15.709.260,00 MKD;   Procurement of technical equipment in the amount of 1.031.000,00 MKD;   Procurement of uniforms for the Border Police in total value of 78.941.505,00 MKD Consequently, a total of 209.126.765,00 MKD were allocated from the budget of both ministries (the Ministry of Defence and the Ministry of the Interior) in 2004 for the establishment of the Border Police. The value of the capital assets (buildings, technical means for border surveillance, armament and other equipment) transferred from the Ministry of Defence to the Ministry of the Interior is not taken into account. In the Supplementary Budget for 2004, the funds for salaries and allowances for the transferred personnel, in the amount of 100.000.000,00 MKD, were transferred from the budget of the Ministry of Defence into the budget of the Ministry of the Interior. Starting from the Budget for 2005, there is a separate line in the Budget for the Border Police, within the Budget of the Ministry of the Interior. A total of 670.362.000,00 MKD is allocated for the Border Police in 2005, classified as follows: 

Categories Amount (MKD) 1. Salaries, fees and allowances for the employees 247.206.000 ,00 
Basic salaries and allowances 163.975.000 ,00 Employers’ contributions for social insurance 82.253.000 ,00 Other contributions from salaries  978.000 ,00 2.    Goods and services   82.775.000 ,00 
Travel and other expenditures 3.400.000 ,00 Communal services, heating, communication and transport 28.025.000 ,00 Petty inventory, tools and other materials for repairs 41.850.000 ,00 Repairs and maintenance 7.700.000 ,00 3.    Capital expenditures 6.100.000 ,00  Buildings 3.000.000 ,00 Purchase of furniture, equipment, vehicles and machines 3.100.000 ,00  TOTAL 670.362.000 ,00 
9. What is done to provide sufficient training? What is the duration of basic training for border guard duties and what is the content of training programmes? Do you provide specific training modules (and in which topics)? According to the Law on Police Academy (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 40/2003) the basic training for a police officer lasts 12 months out of which 3 months of practical field training. The duration of the special training and of the training for security management depends on the specific contents, but is not longer than 12 months.  In the on-going process of transfer of competencies for securing the state border from the Ministry of Defence to the Ministry of the Interior, as well as the agreement between these two Ministries for transfer of certain number of personnel from the Army of the Republic of Macedonia to the Ministry of the Interior, retraining courses have been provided for this personnel. The basic police training course for the Macedonian Army personnel, of medium and lower ranks, (professional soldiers, non - commissioned officers, civilian personnel, and junior officers) is of three months duration, while for higher ranking officers (managerial position officers) the training lasts two months. The training courses are organised only for the personnel of the Army of the Republic of Macedonia who have been previously involved in tasks of securing the state border or in related duties in the Army of the Republic of Macedonia.  With the 06.08.2004 inclusive, there were two basic police training courses organised for the personnel transferred from the Army of the Republic of Macedonia to the Ministry of the Interior, based on the requirements for the Border Police. The training course programmes consisted of the following modules:  Introduction to police work   Police work in a democratic society;    Integrity and ethical conduct - police code of conduct;    Rules for conduct and mutual relations between the employees with special tasks and authorities at the Ministry of the Interior;    Police work in a multiethnic society, discrimination awareness;   Human rights under the UN Declaration and the provisions of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia;    Awareness of differences;  Community policing;  Psychological profiles;   Psychological features in extreme situations and conduct in such situations;    Emotions in extreme situations (affect, stress);    Observation as a psychological method;    Sensations, perceptions and their anomalies;    Sources of frustration in a police setting;  Legal issues and issues related to crime investigation:   Constitutional framework;   Law on Internal Affairs;   Rules for performing the duties in the Ministry of the Interior;   Law on the Crossing of the State Border and Movement In the Border Zone;    Law on Movement and Residence of Aliens;   Law on Travel Documents;   Rulebook on Resolution of Border Incidents;   Specific international (bilateral) agreements of the Republic of Macedonia with the neighbouring and other countries;    Law on Criminal Procedure;   Criminal Code;   The crime of trafficking in human beings;    Crimes of illegal trafficking in arms, drugs, excise goods etc;    Crimes of theft, robbery, armed robbery;   Crimes against human life and body and against gender, freedom and morality;   Forensic investigation at the scene of the crime;    Material evidence  - “corpus delicti”;  Indications;   Law on Asylum and Temporary Protection;   The European law   historical development of the EU and its importance for the border police;   EU institutions and bodies;   EU acquis relevant for the Border Police;   The Schengen Information System;    The right to asylum - refugees in the EU;  Police procedures   Survival - survival and safety skills;   Practical application (exercise) of authorities;   Operational and tactical measures and their application (practical scenarios);    Investigation actions - investigation at the crime scene, search, and application of investigation actions (practical scenarios);   Police notes, forms, practical exercise for their filling in and preparation;    Response - police procedures in cases of violation of the public peace and order by individuals of groups;    Response - police procedures in case of illegal crossing of the state border by individuals and groups;   Entry - exit control of persons and vehicles at the border crossing;    Stopping of persons and vehicles by use of means of force;    Arrests  - deprivation of freedom of minors and adults;   Identity checks - criminal  profile;   Escorting persons in various situations;    Collecting data - criminal intelligence;    Tactics and techniques of interviews with victim, perpetrators, witnesses (minors and adults);    Indications as grounds for suspicion;   Traces and objects as “corpus delicti ; Police defence techniques a)  Self defence:    Martial positions and movements;   Techniques of transport (escort) of persons – in standing, sitting and lying positions;   Hand and leg kicks, blocking, combination of blockings and strikes;  Techniques of falling;   Defence against unarmed assailant (from strikes, grips, strangulations, pushing, throwing, etc.);   Defence against an armed (with knife, gun, rod) assailant;    Baton defence techniques;    Application of defence techniques in specific situations;    Methods of handcuffing (without resistance and overcoming resistance);   Handling and use of personal and formation weapons;   Training for handling and use of AP M70/70A, 7.62 mm calibre;    Training for handling and use of C3 - 99, 9 mm calibre pistol;    Range shooting with AP M70/70A, 7.62 mm calibre;   Range shooting with C3 - 99, 9 mm calibre pistol; The training courses organised for higher ranking officers of two month duration also includes the following module:  Management for improvement of police work    Introduction to management techniques  -  the role of management;   Design, upgrading and reorganisation of the police structure;   Organisation of the police work - police related elements;    Organisation management;    police management;    organisation problem resolution;   Police work programming and planning;   Use of specific operational means and methods - informants, collaborators of justice, operational data, records keeping, use and storage; In addition to the above stated training, in 2004 the following courses and seminars were organised for the border police officers, in cooperation and with the support of partner organisations (OSCE, EU and Geneva Centre for Democratic Control of Armed Forces):    Fight against trafficking in human beings, smuggling and illegal migration;    International human rights standards;   Refugee status determination procedures and criteria;   Detection and identification of illegal drugs;   Initial Response to Arms of Mass Destruction;    Detection of falsified travel documents and visas;    Human Rights and freedoms and police functions in a democratic society;   Handling documents, tests and devices for narcotic materials and explosive devices;    Management of training seminars etc.  Owing to specific features of border control work there is a special programme of introductory training for newly recruited police officers.  It is important to underline that in addition to the basic training, there are also specialised training courses, necessary for efficient performing of duties.  10. In field work, what is the percentage of staff that has received this basic training? As the Border Police de iure functions since 27.04.2004, it must be underlined that the staffing of this institution is still in process.   Thus far, all the members of the Border Police have completed training courses for control and surveillance of the state border. Currently, within the Border Police Department, a total of 1534 working posts are filled. 713 or 46% out of the total number have obtained basic police education. This education was completed in the secondary school for police (former Center for Education of Personnel in the Area of Security) and with further education through courses organised by the Ministry of the Interior and realised by an undergraduate institution - the former Faculty for Security (now Police Academy).  Due to the transfer of the competencies for control and securing of the state border from the Ministry of Defence to the Ministry of the Interior and the need for qualified personnel that would perform activities on securing the state border, thus far, a total of 821 candidates, or 54% have been transferred from the Army of the Republic of Macedonia-Ministry of Defence to the Border Police Department-Ministry of the Interior. Taking into regard that these 821 candidates from the Army had been performing tasks of securing the state border before their transfer to the Ministry of the Interior, they have additionally undergone and completed a course of basic police training at the Police Academy. This course was three months in duration for the lower and medium rank personnel and two months for the higher rank personnel.  This system of training will continue until the completion of the entire staffing process
11. Describe the language skills of staff conducting border checks According to the general conditions for employment in the Ministry of the Interior, all police officers at border crossing posts must have completed secondary education. Curricula for basic, secondary and higher education in the Republic of Macedonia include compulsory study of at least one foreign language. Consequently, all police officers who work at the border crossing points have at least basic knowledge of one foreign language.    The issue of proficiency of all employees (especially the police officers conducting border control) in at least one foreign language presents one of the fundamental priorities for the Border Police Department in the Ministry of the Interior. In that respect, additional efforts will be made during the training of the personnel for Border Police Department in future. This will include, besides studying other specialised fields, compulsory study of several foreign languages as part of the specialised training, which will undoubtedly contribute towards further upgrading of their skills. Currently, two English language courses for the personnel of the Border Police Department, organised by the British Council, are ongoing. One of these courses is aimed at training of instructors for English language lecturing. Upon completion of this course, these instructors will commence training of other personnel of the Border Police Department. Accordingly, it is planned to progressively increase the number of courses and the number of personnel from the Border Police Department included in such courses (especially those executing duties and tasks at the border crossing points) in near future.  12. Describe arrangements of tactical risk analysis and the material provided for this purpose. In which units is this method used? Risk analysis on tactical level is prepared by creating risk indicators that incorporates gathering of information, analysis of information (task of intelligence officers) and distribution of these data to the Border Police Department, as well as to the final users. Gathering of information is performed by all members of the Border Police, also with the use of data bases, engagement of the Intelligence Section and information exchange with other ministries and agencies. The obtained information are distributed to the Intelligence Section where information is analysed and the sources of risks are identified. The analysis is communicated to the higher instances and to the participants in the border security (Border Police stations and border crossings). Due to the increase of collaboration and information exchange, according to the National Strategy on Integrated Border Management and National Action Plan, drafting and adoption of Memoranda and Protocols on Co-operation is ongoing. In the Border Police, tactical analysis is conducted on the level of Border Police regional centres.   13. Describe the use of risk analysis on the level of operative management and possible results. Risk analysis on the operational management level is performed in the Border Police Department. Since it is a service, which has functioned for less then a year, for the preparation of the operational risk analysis a part of the data gathered from the Border Brigade is also used. The analysis is performed through preparation of certain projects of interests to the border service.  According to the subordination method, the results from the analysis are communicated to the regional centres, but these results are also used for preparation and processing of other analysis. The analysis identifies specific cross-border information, specific objectives etc. Correspondingly, the analysis points to possible ways of action. In the operational work, for similar criminal offences or incidents, risk profiles are created, on the basis of linking several aspects that might be connected. Risk specifications leave space for free tactical use and performing border check-ups in a way to allow for flexible movement of travellers without a need for deeper checkups. Considering that this process requires knowledge of the types of risk and the typical kinds of cross-border crime, as well as of various working methods and professional skills for border checkups, various training courses for the personnel of the Border Police Department are currently underway. This way of operation in the border security has born improved results, because the threats are clearly assessed and adequate methods of action are defined.  14. Describe the organisation of the bodies responsible for border control and surveillance: a) legal status and operational structure; b) number of staff involved in border management; development of staff numbers since 2000 and plans for the future; c) adoption of specific border control procedures; d) coordination and co-operation with other relevant services (customs, veterinary and phytosanitary authorities and/or other services/agencies). a) Legal status and operational structure  The  Border Police Department is a component of the Bureau for Public Security, and  is comprised of the following organisational parts: 
Section for European Integration, cross border cooperation and coordination of foreign aid - organises cooperation with border police services of other countries and with the competent Ministries in relation to border police operations, performs exchange of information etc. This Section is comprised of:   Unit for European Integration and Cross - Border Cooperation    Unit  for Coordination of Foreign Aid and for Project Development  
Section for Analysis, performs analytical and information-related activities in the area of border police operation; prepares analysis, overviews and information and defines directions for appropriate actions of the border police etc.  Sector for Border Crossing Points and State Border Surveillance - monitors, coordinates and improves the operation at the border crossing points and border police stations; performs the control and monitoring function; monitors the situation at the border crossing points with regards to certain events and issues related to enforcement of the regulations and control of crossing of the state border and communicates the information it receives from the border crossing points and the border police stations to the competent organisational units within the Ministry of the Interior. This Sector is comprised of:   Section for Border Crossing Points    Section for Surveillance of the State Border 
Sector for operations - performs coordination of the operations of the regional centres and the operational coordination centre, as well as collection, processing and analysis of data and information related to the work of the border police; distribution of intelligence data and information related to the operation of the border police; supervision of the current operational activities and their analysis, in case of border incidents and other violations of the state border; coordinates the activities with the border police services of the neighbouring countries, etc. This Sector is comprised of:    Section for intelligence, comprised of 3 units:   Unit for Intelligence and Cooperation with Other Ministries and Agencies;    Unit for Security and Counter Protection and    Unit for Operational and Technical Support    Section for Operational Planning   Operational - Coordination Centre 
Sector for Support of the Border Police Operations - provides support for border police operations through collecting and documenting of information; provides guidelines for implementation of these activities; detects and prevents illegal migration and trafficking in human beings; organises a transit center; performs criminal investigations; coordinates its activities with the activities of other competent Ministries related to the border management; collects and processes data related to cross - border crime; distributes them to the competent structures; performs secret surveillance and shadowing; creates records using photo - technical and other activities in cases of a cross border crime; etc. This Sector is comprised of:   Section for Illegal migration    Transit Centre (as an integral part of the Section for Illegal Migration)   Section for Criminal Police Investigations  Section for Documentation   Section for Surveillance and Documenting 
Sector for Administrative and Logistical Support - provides administrative and logistical support, controls the financial operations, performs assessment of the material and technical needs of the border police, etc. This Sector is comprised of:   Section for Logistical Support   Section for Administrative Support   Section for Financial Operations    Centre for Logistics Specific situations on various parts of the border with the neighbouring countries also require an adequately adapted approach, having in mind the fact that each of the parts has different features in terms of criminality, movement of people, goods, etc. Most of the police operation will be performed within the local police areas, or regions, which will be grouped into Regional Centres.  Four regions and four centres will be established, each of them responsible for a part of the border, corresponding to the one of the neighbouring countries.   Regional Centre South for the border with the Republic of Greece   Regional Centre East for the border with the Republic of Bulgaria,    Regional Centre West for the border with the Republic of Albania, and    Regional Centre North for the border with the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro Each Regional Centre will align and coordinate the activities at the border crossing points and the Border Police stations at its respective part of the state border. At this moment, two Regional Centres are operational: the Regional Centre – South from 01.05.2004 and Regional Centre - East from 01.09.2004. Regional Centre – South 
  Section for operations, border crossing points, and state border surveillance   Section for intelligence   Section for fight against organised crime, illegal immigration and communication with the local communities    Section for administrative and logistical support    Unit for analytics   Border Police Station – Markova Noga   Border Police Station – Solunski Pat   Border Police Station – Staravina   Border Police Station – Nidže   Border Police Station – Bogorodica   Border Police Station – Star Dojran   Border crossing point for road traffic - Medžtlija   Border crossing point for road traffic - Bogorodica   Border crossing point for road traffic – Star Dojran   Border crossing point for railway traffic – Gevgelija 
Regional Centre – EAST 
  Section for operations, border crossing points and state border surveillance   Section for intelligence   Section for fight against the organised crime, illegal immigration and communication with the local communities   Section for administrative and logistical support   Unit for analytics   Border Police Station – Berovo   Border Police Station – Novo Selo   Border Police Station – Makedonska Kamenica   Border Police Station – Delevo   Border crossing point for road traffic – Novo Selo   Border crossing point for road traffic – Delevo 
Regional Centre – NORTH 
  Section for operations, border crossing points and state border surveillance   Section for intelligence   Section for fight against the organised crime, illegal immigration and communication with the local communities   Section for administrative and logistical support   Unit for analytics   Border crossing point for road traffic – Deve Bair   Border crossing point for road traffic – Pelince   Border crossing point for road traffic – Tabanovce   Border crossing point for road traffic – Dolno Blace   Border crossing point for road traffic – Jažince   Border crossing point for road traffic – Strezimir   Border crossing point for railway traffic – Tabanovce   Border crossing point for railway traffic – Volkovo   Border crossing point for air traffic – Airport Skopje 
Regional Centre – WEST 
  Section for operations, border crossing points and state border surveillance   Section for intelligence   Section for fight against the organised crime, illegal immigration and communication with the local communities   Section for administrative and logistical support   Unit for analytics   Border crossing point for road traffic – Blato   Border crossing point for road traffic – afasan   Border crossing point for road traffic – Sveti Naum   Border crossing point for road traffic – Stenje   Border crossing for air traffic – Airport Ohrid   Border Police Station for lake control 
National Coordination Centre for Border Management In order to achieve efficient coordination, mutual support, facilitated flow of information and greater integration in all aspects of the border management, the Border Police as the most competent service for border management will establish a National Coordination Centre for Border Management. This Centre is a central element of the National Strategy and central point of operational integration, cooperation and coordination. Through the Centre, the entire border will be overseen 24 hours a day, a fast exchange of information between the various Ministries involved in the border management will be provided.and joint activities, operations and dealing with incidents will be coordinated on regional and national level. Although the Border Police is the primary agency for border management, it will not have authority over the related agencies for border management. It will facilitate the cooperation and coordination by providing services and support to these entities, based on the principle of administrative assistance. b) Number of personnel involved in the border management, fluctuation of the number of employees from 2000 and future plans  Year Number of employees 2000 577 2001 660 2002 652 2003 670 2004 1276 Plan for 2005 2746 
c) Adoption of special procedures of border control  The Border Police at this moment performs its activities and operational tasks at the state border in accordance with the Laws, Decrees, Rulebooks, Guidelines and other instructions for operation issued in writing, such as Orders and Instructive Telegrams.  On 17.09.2004 in the Border Police Department, based on a prepared Project document (No.33 - 416/1 prepared by the Border Police Department, and approved by the Director of the Bureau for Public Security) a working group was established for development of standard procedures of conduct for the Border Police officers. According to this project, the preparation of the procedures should be completed by the end of 2005. d) Coordination and cooperation with other services (customs, veterinary and phytosanitary surveillance and/or other services and bodies) Ministry of Finance Customs Administration The Customs Administration is a competent state body for processing of legal goods, detection of illegal goods and investigations related to customs offences and criminal offences in the area of customs operation. According to the Law on Customs Administration (Official Gazette of RM no. 46/2004) the Customs Administration is directly responsible for enforcing the customs surveillance and control, clearance of goods and undertaking investigative and intelligence measures for prevention, detection and investigation of customs and criminal offences.    The Border Police and the Customs Administration at the border crossing points perform their regular activities in accordance with their legal competencies. However in special cases and upon special indications they undertake coordinated activities for examination of persons, vehicles and luggage;   In meetings which take place before the start of the tourist season, national or international events, sport activities and other events and occurrences which can increase the traffic frequency, they review the situation at the border crossing points and agree on activities on facilitated and faster flow of passengers and vehicles;   Upon a previous initiative of one of the services, they organise meetings to resolve current and newly emerged problems at the border crossing points, which are within the competencies of the Border Police and the Customs Administration;   The Customs Administration is responsible for detection of illegal goods and investigations related to customs offences and criminal offences in the area of customs operation;    Having in mind the objective to increase the flow of goods and passengers, as well as prevention of illegal importing of goods in the customs area (the entire territory) of the Republic of Macedonia, a Memorandum of Cooperation between the Customs Administration and the Border Police was signed on 18.11.2004. This Memorandum specifies the procedures for coordination and it aligns the competencies for action and the possibility to transfer the competencies in certain situations at the border crossing points and at the green border;   The coordination between the Customs Administration and the Border Police in the future will be implemented within the framework of the responsibilities of the National Coordination Centre, where the Customs Administration will have its representative;   The need of cooperation between the police and the customs is especially expressed with regards to dealing with the most severe forms of organised crime. Due to this reason, it is planned to connect the systems for information-sharing, analysis and intelligence of the police and the customs;   To fight with the most severe forms of crime, such as the illegal trade in drugs and other types of organised crime, where the Customs and the police have common elements in their work, a specific-tasks mixed teams that will work on specific intelligence-oriented operations will be established;   The National Coordination Centre, the Border Police and the Customs Administration will work together to create internal mechanisms and standard operational procedures for reaction, which will contribute towards fast and efficient reaction upon received information from the National Coordination Centre; 
Ministry of Defence  Army of the Republic of Macedonia  According to the Law on Crossing of the State Border and on Movement Inside the Border Zone (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 36/92, 12/93, 11/94 and 19/2004) the control of the crossing of the state border and control of movement and stay in the border zone is performed by the Ministry of the Interior, while the Border Brigade of the Army of the Republic of Macedonia, i.e. the Border Battalions on the regional level, secure the state border and perform control of movement and stay of persons outside settlements and border crossing points. In accordance with the amendments introduced to this law, the process of taking over the competencies for securing the state border will be fully implemented by the end of 2005. At this moment, the control of the sate border and stay in the border zone at the border with the   Republic of Greece, Republic of Bulgaria and a part of the border with the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro (towards Kosovo) are under the competencies of the Ministry of the Interior i.e., the Border Police Department, while the securing of the state border and control of movement and stay of persons in the border zone outside settlements, in a part of the border with the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro (towards Kosovo) and with the Republic of Albania is within the competencies of the Army of the Republic of Macedonia. The cooperation between the Border Brigade and the Border Police is carried out through the following forms:   Regular meetings at local level where they exchange information about the situation on the state border and events, incidents and findings of interest for the security of the border.    According to the aforementioned legislation and the prescribed competencies, they propose and agree on undertaking necessary activities for securing of the state border.   Timely information exchange about a certain event which occurred on the state border, where in accordance with the competencies it is necessary to undertake further activities by the Border Police or other services within the Ministry of the Interior.    Acting in cases of recent border incidents on the green border, and participation in the Sectorial Committee for Border Incidents on regional and central level, to review, establish and resolve the border incidents. 
Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Resources Management Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Resources Management undertakes activities in the area of control of crossing of the state border through the Veterinary Directorate, in charge of the veterinary and sanitary surveillance and control of import, export and transit of shipments of animal origin, as well as throough the State Agriculture Inspectorate and Plant Protection Directorate, in charge of surveillance and control of shipments of vegetable origin and plant protection means. For more details about the legislation regulating this area see answer 24_A_01The coordination and cooperation with other services is taking place at central level and on the border crossing points (local level) through daily contacts, periodic meetings, information-dissemination, provision of expert assistance, etc. To facilitate the trade, transport and flow of these types of goods, the Ministry will modify the methodology of covering the border crossing points with concentrating greater number of first category inspectors. For the modification in the manner of operation and cooperation a Memorandum of Cooperation will be developed. These measures will increase the efficiency of the border control, accelerate the flow of agricultural products, and the backlogs in the traffic of commercial vehicles will be reduced. Ministry of Health The Ministry of Health, through the State Sanitary and Health Inspectorate and the Drug Bureau within are in charge of the safety of foodstuffs, products and materials in contact with foodstuffs, protection from ionizing radiation, protection from contagious diseases, transport of precursors, dangerous goods and poisons. For more details on the competencies of this Ministry see answer 24_A_01. At the border crossing points and at customs terminals, inspection surveillance is performed of passengers and means of transport coming from countries struck with epidemics and contagious diseases.  The cooperation on central level is executed through organisation of inter-ministerial meetings where undertaking of activities from within the competences of both Ministries is agreed. The Ministry of Health regularly informs the Ministry of the Interior about the prohibition of import of certain types of goods in the Republic of Macedonia. At the border crossing points, the cooperation is a component of the daily performance of the working tasks and is carried out by strengthening the control of all entities dealing with transport of such goods. From this viewpoint, information exchange on certain events and phenomena, and provision of expert assistance in the course of the control is an important factor for timely detection and suppression of incriminated activities of this type.  According to the Law on Crossing of the State Border and Movement Inside the Border Zone (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 36/92, 66/92, 12/93, 15/93, 31/93, 11/94 and 19/04), and for harmonised performance of certain activities of common interest for several state bodies with competencies in the area of crossing of the state border, the Minister of Interior with the competent state bodies can establish mixed committees and other working bodies.  The coordination and cooperation of the competent Ministries will be implemented in future through the National System of Border Monitoring, which will provide for safe and fast communications, over a fully integrated mechanism for operative agreement and planning. The National Coordination Centre, according to the principle of Administrative assistance, will provide services, support and coordination of the activities of the ministries with competencies in the border management. For implementation of these activities, the centre will include liaison officers from all ministries which, in accordance with their competencies, perform certain tasks at the state border. 15. Do you have specific operational mobile units for border surveillance and if yes, in which parts of the borders? According to the Rulebook on the Organisation and Operation of the Ministry of the Interior (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 12/98 and 15/03) which prescribes the organisational setup of the Border Police Department within the Ministry of the Interior and in these frames of the Border Police stations, surveillance of the state border is carried out by the employees of the Border Police stations organised in mobile police patrols. At the moment, they are operating on the borders transferred to the Ministry of the Interior, in border areas approximately 10 kilometres inland from the state border. After the transfer of responsibility of the other parts of the border according to the approved plan, such mobile police patrols will operate in accordance with the tactical evaluation of the whole state border.  The mobile police patrols are responsible for prevention of all attempts of committing cross-border crime. Special emphasis is put on the prevention of illegal crossing of the state border, movement and stay within the border area and illegal trafficking in human beings and goods. The abovementioned patrols also prevent the crossing of the state border of sabotage–terrorist groups.  In the course of their activities the mobile police patrols establish contact and close coordination with the local population and community, based on confidence building, data exchange and support and assistance aimed at preventive action. Within the Ministry of Finance - Customs Administration mobile teams operate primarily on suppression of smuggling according to a special plan or indicated need for increased surveillance on a particular border crossing point (e.g. crowded traffic directions, air ports and custom terminals). The Mobile Teams Unit is organised in teams operating on the whole territory of the Republic of Macedonia. A rapid interventions taskforce (duty team) is operating, as well.  Mixed teams from the Investigations and Intelligence Unit and the Mobile Teams Unit are created for particular operations, especially when smuggling of prohibited goods (e.g. narcotics) or excise goods has to be prevented or intercepted. The mobile customs teams operate in coordination i.e. together with the police teams when acting in operations on regional and local level. Even though the mobile teams do not conduct their operations on the official border crossing points, they sometimes act for the purpose of strengthening the personnel on the border crossing points using operational-technical means. 16. Is there a body responsible for centralised supervision and instruction for checks and surveillance? Does it have satisfactory means to fulfil this duty? The introduction of the new integrated concept of border management, within the National Strategy on Integrated Border Management the establishemnt of a National Coordination Centre for Border Management, subordinated to the Department for Border Police is planned. This Centre will cooperate with all the other national services involved in the border management. The National Coordination Centre for Border Management will supervise the situation at all state borders, and will provide fast information exchange between the Ministries involved in the border management and will coordinate the joint activities, operations and dealing with incidents, if that is needed on national level.  It is necessary to mention that at this moment, and in the forthcoming period until the National Coordination Centre for Border Management is established, the only body in charge of central supervision and provision of instructions for control is the Border Police Department within the Ministry of the Interior. The Border Police Department does not yet possess sufficient means and equipment to perform fully the tasks and competencies within the scope of border management, such as: a system for border data management;  system for surveillance using cameras, which will facilitate tracking of the transport flow and activities on all border crossing points and airports (it is installed only on some of the border crossing points); modern systems for radio and telephone communications; and a system for digital telecommunication networking of all border crossing points. There is also a shortage of motor vehicles and IT (computer) equipment.   17. How are the ministerial competences arranged in regard to border management (administrative arrangements)? The Law on Organisation and Operation of the State Administration Bodies (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos. 58/00 and 44/02) governs the organisational setup, competencies and operation of the state administration bodies. According to the abovementioned law and other laws, the state administration bodies that have competencies in the state border management are:   Ministry of the Interior: According to the provisions of the Law on Internal Affairs (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” Nos. 19/95, 55/97, 38/02, 33/03 and 19/04), one of the competencies of the Ministry of the Interior is the protection of the state border, control of crossing of the state border and stay in the border zone. The activities for protection of the state border, detection and resolving of border incidents and other violations of the state border and other activities established by law are performed by the Border Police.    Ministry of Defence – Protection of the territorial sovereignty and integrity of the state (for more details see answer 24_A_01) as well as cooperation with the Border Police Department, especially regarding the collection of intelligence data on various forms of trans-border crime.   Ministry of Foreign Affairs – visa regime, delineation and marking of the state border, maintenance of the border markings, conclusion of international agreements;   Ministry of Finance – Customs Administration: processing of legal goods, detection of illegal goods and investigations related to customs offences and criminal offences established by law and related to the area of customs’ operations. According to the Law on Customs Administration (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/04), among its other competencies, the Customs Administration is responsible for performing: customs control; investigative and intelligence measures in order to prevent, detect and investigate customs offences and criminal offences; control of export, import and transit of goods for which special measures are proscribed in the interest of security and public moral, protection of the life and health of people, animals and plants, environment protection, protection of goods under the regime of temporary protection or cultural heritage and natural rarities, protection of copyright and other related rights and industrial property rights, as well as other trade policy measures proscribed by the law;   Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Resources Management – Veterinary and phytosanitary control – control and examination of shipments of animal origin in circulation across the border crossing points.   Ministry of Health – Prevention of spreading of contagious diseases and protection of health of the population.  At the border crossing points, the Ministry of Health through the State Sanitary and Health Inspectorate and Bureau of Medi cations, performs supervision over the application of laws explained in greater detail in answer 24_A_01.  The Border Surveillance Unit as an organisational unit within the State Sanitary and Health Inspectorate, carries out inspection supervision of the border and customs terminals  shipments of poisons and import and transport of nauseating and contagious substances. It also performs sanitary and healthcare surveillance of passengers in the international traffic and in the vehicles coming into the Republic of Macedonia from countries struck by epidemics and endemics of quarantine contagious diseases and performs supervision of safety of the import of foodstuffs and items in general use. A cooperation and coordination in the aforementioned domains is established with the Customs Administration, the Veterinary Administration and the Plant Protection Directorate.    Ministry of Transport and Communications – road, railway and air traffic;   Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning – participation in the activities of the National Commission for Health, Security and Environment (after it is established);   Ministry of Education and Science – participation in development of operational rules and procedures for the Directorate for Radiation Safety;  The activities on the state border management are coordinated and performed in mutual cooperation between the above mentioned ministries and state bodies. 18. How does your country co-operate with neighbouring countries (formal bilateral agreements as well as practical arrangements on customs and border police activities)? The cross-border cooperation with the neighbouring countries is based on concluded bilateral/international agreements regulating a specific area of cooperation. Furthermore, joint bodies are established for cooperation in a specific area of interest of the states, parties to the agreement. Cooperation with the neighbouring countries is also maintained through various regular, as well as ad hoc meetings, where discussions take place, and solutions are found for various kinds of problems that might appear in the border cooperation.  The cooperation with the neighbouring countries is as follows: Republic 
f Albania Agreement between the Macedonian and Albanian Government on Maintenance, Renovation and Demarcation of the Border Line and Border Marks (Signage) dated 04.12.1997, ratified on 11.02.1998 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 9/98).  In accordance with the Agreement, a Joint Committee was established as well as two sector committees for recovery of the border marks and demarcation of the border line on the Macedonian – Albanian state border. The Joint Committee held its first meeting on 04.12.1998 in Skopje. The Agreement between the Macedonian and Albanian Government on Regulation of the Cross - Border Traffic of Persons in the Border Zone dated 04.12.1987 was ratified on 19.03.1998 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 15/98). The Agreement foresees the establishment of a Permanent Joint Macedonian-Albanian Committee, determines its competencies, tasks, meeting modality and ways of operation;   The Agreement between the Macedonian and Albanian Government on Prevention and Resolving the Incidents on the Macedonian - Albanian State Border Line dated 04.12.1997, ratified on 11.02.1998 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 9/98). On the basis of this Agreement a Main Joint Macedonian – Albanian Committee on Border Incidents was established, as well as two sector joint committees on border incidents, for both border sectors;     Agreement on Cooperation between the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia and the Ministry of Public Order of the Republic of Albania dated 16.07.2000. On the basis of this Agreement, the following documents were also signed:    Protocol on Defining Directions and Modes of Cooperation in the Field of Border Crossing Control and Prevention of Illegal Migration between the Ministry of Public Order of the Republic of Albania and the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia dated 16.07.2000;   Protocol on Cooperation in the Security Field between the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia and the Ministry of Public Order of the Republic of Albania and the National Information Service of Albania dated 05.06.1992;   Memorandum of Understanding between the Ministry of Defence of the Republic of Macedonia and the Ministry of Defence of the Republic of Albania on Cooperation and Promotion of Contacts dated 05.02.2003. It is also noteworthy to mention the project document “Danida” on strengthening the border cooperation between Republic of Albania and the Republic of Macedonia regarding the border line Debar-Diber, signed on January 2004 between the Ministry of Public Order of the Republic of Albania and the Ministry of the Interior and Ministry of Defence of the Republic of Macedonia.   The goal of this project is the strengthening of safety and establishment of reciprocal trust on the border line Debar-Diber between the Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Albania through a close cooperation in identifying, prevention and fight against the cross-border crime and illegal activities, throughout the following:    Improvement of the information exchange and communication;   Providing education and training;    Preparation and strengthening of joint actions and join control; and    Preparation of a legal framework - Memorandum of Understanding.  The alignment of positions regarding the Memorandum of Understanding between the Ministry of the Interior and Ministry of Defence of the Republic of Macedonia and the Ministry of Public Order of the Republic of Albania for promotion and strengthening of the cooperation in the field of border security is currently underway (the signing of this Memorandum should take place in the first half of 2005).  Republic of Greece Interim agreement dated 13.09.1995 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 48/95);, confirmed the mutual existing border between the Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Greece as permanent and inviolable international border.  Protocol on Cross-border Cooperation dated 23.06.1998.  With the above mentioned Protocol both parties agreed that until a bilateral agreement is signed, their mutual relations regarding the state border between the two states would be managed according to the provision of the Protocol between the Government of FNRY and the Government of Kingdom of Greece on securing, maintenance and renovation of the border marks (signage) (land and water) on the Yugoslav-Greek border as well as, on alert, prevention, methods of investigation and resolving of border incidents, signed on 17.12.1958. On the basis of the abovementioned Protocol, a Joint Committee on securing, maintenance and recovery of the border signage and resolving the border incidents was established, holding regular meetings. At this moment, in addition to the above mentioned, it is an already established practice with the Republic of Greece to maintain regular working meetings between the services directly involved in the state border security and simultaneously, a link for information exchange pertaining to the border security was established.  State Union of Serbia and Montenegro 
  Agreement between the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia and the Republic of Macedonia Concerning the Delineation and Description of the State Border dated 23.02.2001, ratified in March 2001(“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 19/01). On the basis of this Agreement a Joint Committee for the Demarcation was established and simultaneously the demarcation of the state border was initiated. Until now, from the junction of the three state borders - the Republic of Macedonia, the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro and the Republic of Bulgaria to the border crossing point Tabanovce, all main border marks are placed and also about 90% from the assisting border marks;   Protocol on Opening Border Crossing Points for Border Traffic between the Republic of Macedonia and Serbia and Montenegro dated 29.03.2003, as well as the modalities for its implementation;   Memorandum between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Serbia on Cooperation in Fight Against Terrorism, Organised Crime, Illegal Trade with Narcotic Drugs, Psychotropic Substances and Precursors, Illegal Migration and Other Criminal Offences, signed on 25.07.2003;   Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Montenegro on Fight Against Terrorism, Organised Crime, Illegal Trade with Narcotic Drugs, Psychotropic Substances and Precursors, Illegal Migration and Other Criminal Offences, signed on 10.06.2003, ratified on 22.07.2003 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 52/2003). The harmonisation of positions regarding the Draft Agreement for the basis of cooperation in securing the state border between the Republic of Macedonia and the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro is currently underway. UNMIK 
  Memorandum of Understanding between the Republic of Macedonia and UNMIK dated 2001;  Police Cooperation Protocol dated 29.08.2002. On the basis of the Protocol on Opening Border Crossing Points for Border Traffic between the Republic of Macedonia and Serbia and Montenegro an Interim Protocol on Temporary Border Crossing Points for Border Traffic between the Republic of Macedonia and UNMIK was signed (Tanuševci and Strezimir). Regarding the border cooperation with UNMIK, the already established practice of regular working meetings of the representatives of the border services of the Republic of Macedonia and of UNMIK is evaluated as very useful for the purpose of information exchange about the problems that occur in the everyday functioning of the border crossings. Furthermore, liaison officers for information exchange pertaining to the border security are appointed.  Republic of Bulgaria  
  Agreement on Cooperation in the Security Field between the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia and the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Bulgaria dated 20.10.1992, ratified in 1993 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 49/93).On the basis of this Agreement, between the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia and the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Bulgaria on 20.10.1992 the following document was also signed:   Protocol on Determining the Directions, Mode and Order of Cooperation in the Field of the Border Control and Prevention of the Illegal Immigration;    Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and Government of the Republic of Bulgaria on Readmission of Persons with Illegal Stay dated 04.06.2001, ratified in 2002 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 12/2002);   Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Bulgaria on Measures for Prevention and Resolving Border Incidents on the Macedonian – Bulgarian border dated 15.05.2000, ratified on 23.01.2002(“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 13/2002). With the Agreement, a main joint Macedonian-Bulgarian Commission on border incidents was established, as well as two sector Joint Committees on Border Incidents that are maintaining regular meetings;    Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Bulgaria on Securing Maintenance, Recovery and Demarcation of the Border Line and the Border Marks on the Macedonian-Bulgarian state border, signed on 15.05.2000, ratified on 23.01.2002 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 12/2002). On the basis of the above mentioned Agreement, a Joint Committee on Securing, Maintenance, Renovation and Marking of the Macedonian-Bulgarian border was established;     Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Bulgaria on the Fight Against Terrorism, Organised Crime, Illegal Traffic with Narcotic Drugs, Psychotropic Substances and Precursors, Illegal Migration and Criminal Offences dated 26.02.2002 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 6/2003).On the basis of this Agreement, a Protocol on Cooperation between the Police Department – Sector on Border Crossing Points within the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia and the National Service Border Police within the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Bulgaria was signed in 2003;   Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Bulgaria on Opening Two New International Border Crossing Points between the two countries, ratified in 1999 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 44/99). Besides the Ministry of the Interior, the Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia also constantly endeavours to improve the international cooperation and to develop friendly relations with other customs administrations, particularly those of the neighbouring countries. Cooperation with all neighbouring countries is successfully conducted, mainly through concluding and ratifying agreements on customs cooperation on bilateral level. In this line, the Law on Customs Administration regulates the cooperation with the customs administrations of other countries in the field of customs activities based on ratified international conventions (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/2004). The Government of the Republic of Macedonia cooperates with the governments of the neighbouring countries on the basis of the following agreements on customs:    Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Federal Government of the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia on Customs Cooperation and Mutual Assistance (signed on 04.09.1996; ”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 8/1997);   Agreement between the Macedonian Government and the Albanian Government on Mutual Assistance and Cooperation between their Customs Offices (signed on 15.01.1998; ”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 15/1998);   Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Bulgaria on Cooperation and Mutual Assistance in the Customs Matters (signed on 14.06.1999; ”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 44/1999). The customs cooperation with the Republic of Greece is conducted according to the Protocol 5 of the Stabilisation and Association Agreement, signed between the Republic of Macedonia and the European Community on 09.04.2001.  Cooperation with the Interim Administration of the United Nations Mission in Kosovo (UNMIK) is conducted on the basis of the signed Memorandum of Understanding between the Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia and the Customs Service of the Interim Administration of UNMIK on 30.06.2000.  The mutual customs cooperation includes the following activities:    Cooperation in the field of simplification of the customs formalities, adoption of measures in order to simplify the customs procedures, as well as accelerating the flow of goods between the contracting parties;   Information exchange for the implementation of the customs legislation to enable precise determining of the customs and other import and export charges, as well as precise determining of the classification, value and origin of goods by the customs offices;   Exchange of information and documents at shortest possible notice to enable prevention of all kinds of customs offences;   Exchange of information and data on flow of: hazardous goods (for the environment and health): weapons/arms, ammunition, explosive and toxic materials, explosives; objects with historical, artistic, cultural or archaeological value;   In order to enhance the activities of prevention, investigation and fight against illegal trade with narcotic drugs, psychotropic substances and their synthetic products, the customs offices exchange information at shortest possible notice on persons and transport vehicles for which information is available that have been used or that might be used for illegal trade;   Cooperation and undertaking of measures within its competencies in order to enable appropriate application of the controlled delivery on international level, as well as to uncover the persons involved in the illegal trade and to undertake legal actions against them;   Establishment of an efficient coordination between the customs offices, including exchange of personnel and experts from various fields, providing expert, scientific and technical assistance.  In accordance with the signed Agreements on customs cooperation with the neighbouring countries and the Interim Administration of United Nations Mission in Kosovo (UNMIK), informative lists on excise goods are exchanged, which results in mutual notification of the excise goods deliveries, with direct handing over of the goods and the accompanying documentation among the responsible customs officers. These practices improve prevention of smuggling of this kind of goods.  Cooperation with the neighbouring countries is continuously ongoing via regular meetings on all levels, participation at international meetings and acting in working groups, projects and programmes of regional and wider scope. The Border Police and the Customs Administration cooperate jointly on a regular base via information exchange and holding working meetings where activities concerning the border are planned and agreed upon, while afterwards jointly implemented. 19. What is the state of affairs concerning international agreements on borders and border co-operation with neighbouring countries? Please provide: a) short description of agreements existing or being planned; b) summary of the content of the agreements; c) level at which the agreements were or will be adopted, as well as the (expected) time of adoption. Guided by the strategic orientation for development and improvement of good relations with all of its neighbours, the Republic of Macedonia since its independence, undertook activities for contractual arrangements in the area of border co-operation. Despite facing numerous political problems and military activities on the territory of former Yugoslavia, thus far the Republic of Macedonia is the only state successor of Yugoslavia, which succeeded to contractually arrange the issue of borders and border co-operation with all of its neighbours. Republic of Albania The Republic of Macedonia, since its independence, has concluded numerous bilateral Agreements, Treaties, Protocols and Memorandums with the Republic of Albania. These bilateral documents relate to  many areas. Thus far, the reciprocal contacts were in the spirit of mutual understanding, friendship and desire for good-neighbourly cooperation. It is expected that the activities and cooperation between the two countries in the area of cross-border cooperation, particularly in the field of maintenance, recovery and demarcation of the border line and border signage at the common border, will gain intensity during the next year.  The border co-operation between the Republic of Macedonia and Republic of Albania is being carried out in accordance with the provisions of the following documents:  AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonian and the Council of Ministers of the Republic of Albanian on the Measures for Prevention and Resolving the Incidents  on the Macedonian - Albanian State Border   
  This Agreement regulates the reciprocal cooperation, in view of prevention and resolving the incidents on the joint state border.   The essential elements of this Agreement determine the activities that are considered as border incidents; the manner, bodies and instruments which will be involved in the review and determining and resolving the incidents that may occur on the Macedonian - Albanian State border. On the basis of this Agreement, a Permanent Joint Macedonian - Albanian Committee on Border Incidents was established, as well as two Sectorial Joint Committees on Border Incidents. The provisions from the Agreement stipulate the number of members of the Main and of the Sectorial Committees, their duties, time schedule for holding regular meetings and manner of performing the operations of the Committees. The Main Joint Committee has been established and thus far, two regular meetings were held. It is expected that the Main Joint Committee will continue its operation in the course of 2005. The Sectorial Joint Committees are holding regular meetings twice a year.   This Agreement was signed on 04.12.1997. It was ratified on 11.02.1998, and entered into force on 27.02.1998 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 9/98). 
AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Council of Ministers of the Republic of Albania regarding Maintenance, Renovation and Demarcation of the Borderline and Border Posts on the Macedonian - Albanian Border  a)  The Agreement regulates all issues pertaining to maintenance and recovery of the existing border pyramids, for the purpose of avoiding misunderstandings, and for strengthening the good-neighbourly relations between the two countries,. b)  The essential elements of the Agreement define the sectors at the Macedonian-Albanian border and the parties responsible for maintenance of each of the sectors. This Agreement also regulates the manner for maintenance and recovery of the border signage, inclusive of coastal signage, navigable signals and tracer devices, costs for their maintenance and recovery, as well as the procedure of regular review and inspection related to the maintenance and recovery. For the purpose of implementation of this assignments, a Main Joint Macedonian-Albanian Committee on Renovation and Demarcation of the Border Line is established, as well as Sectorial Joint Committees for both sectors at the common border. Furthermore, the provisions of the Agreement define more precisely the role, competencies and tasks of the Committees as well as their composition and the manner of operation. Thus far, the Main Joint Committee held one meeting. It is expected that the Committee will continue its operation in the course of 2005.  c)  This Agreement was signed on 04.12.1997.  It was ratified on 11.02.1998 and entered into force on  27.02.1998 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 9/98). 
AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Council of Ministers of the Republic of Albania on Regulating the Local Border Traffic of Persons in the Border Zone  a)  This Agreement regulates the issues of crossing the Macedonian-Albanian State border considering the needs and interests of the border population. The Agreement concerns exclusively the nationals of both countries residing in the border zone. b)  The essential elements of the Agreement define the delineation of the border zone from both sides of the border, the manner of crossing and location of the border crossing points, the manner of movement in the border zone, the documents that are issued for crossing of border, as well as the bodies competent for the implementation of this Agreement. On the basis of this Agreement, a Regular Joint Macedonian-Albanian Committee is established. Its competencies, tasks, meetings and manner of operation are determined with this Agreement. Thus far, the Regular Joint Committee held two regular meetings. The Committee will continue its operation in the course of 2005. c)  This Agreement was signed on 04.12.1997. It was ratified on 19.03.1998, and entered into force on  13.04.1998 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 15/98). 
AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Council of Ministers of the Republic of Albania on Abolition of Visas for Diplomatic and Official Travel Documents and the Amount of Fees for Issuance of Other Types of Visa  a)  With this Agreement, and on the basis of principle of reciprocity, the two countries agreed on reciprocal abolition of visas for valid diplomatic and official passports holders. b)  The essential elements of the Agreement provide for the citizens of the contracting states, holders of other types of travel documents, visa issuing within the diplomatic-consular missions in their respective countries or at the border crossing points. The Agreement defines the type of visas and the amount of fees, depending on whether the visas are being issued at the diplomatic-consular missions or at the border crossing points, and depending on the type of the visa.  c)  This Agreement was signed on 04.12.1997. It was ratified on 11.02.1998, and entered into force on  09.02.1998 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 9/98).  
AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Council of Ministers of the Republic of Albania on International Transport of Passengers and Goods in the Road Traffic a)  The Agreement regulates the transport of passengers and goods by motor vehicles between the two countries.  b)  The essential elements of the Agreement are divided into three sections: “Transport of passengers”, which encompass the regime of permits, regular lines, lines out of established time table and lines out of established time table which need a license; “Transport of Goods”, which encompass the regime of permits and “Other Provisions”, which encompass the cabotage and transport to third countries, vehicle weight and dimensions, fees and duties, customs matters, national legislation, violations of the agreement, competent bodies, entering into force and validity of the Agreement. c)  This Agreement was signed on  15.01.1998. It was ratified on 19.03.1998, and entered into force on 03.05.1998 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 15/98). 
AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Council of Ministers of the Republic of Albania on Regular Air Traffic a)  On the basis of this Agreement, and according to the Convention on International Civil Aviation, the two countries regulate the issue of establishing regular air traffic between, and out of the territories of the contracting parties. b)  The essential elements of the Agreement are incorporated in the provisions regulating: the awarding of traffic rights; exchange of aircrafts; work permits; suspension and withdrawal; competition; recognition of certificates and permits;  exemption from customs and other duties; establishing the flight schedule; airport fees; double taxation; direct transit transport; tariffs; air safety and security; computer booking system; application of the laws and other regulations and procedures; trade and transfer of surplus assets; commercial activities; provision of statistical data; consultations and modifications in the communication and; provisions on dispute resolution. The Agreement establishes that its provisions are subject to the provisions of the Convention, as long as these provisions are valid in the international air traffic. This Agreement, as well as its amendments are registered in the Council of International Civil Aviation Organisation. c)  This Agreement was signed on 04.06 1998. It was ratified by the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia on 05.06.1999 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 7/99). A response is awaited from the Albanian side on ratification of this Agreement by the Assembly of the Republic of Albania. 
AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Albania on Readmission of persons with the Protocol on Implementing of the Agreement a)  The provisions of this Agreement, on the basis of reciprocity, regulate the cooperation between the two countries on handing over, admission and readmission of persons with an illegal stay on the territory of the other country. b)  The essential elements of the Agreement regulate the procedure at the common border of the Republic of Macedonia and Republic of Albania on handing over, admission and readmission of citizens of the two countries with illegal stay, citizens of third countries and stateless persons, and in the provisions governing the cases in which the two countries will permit a citizen of a third country to transit through their territory. The other issues regulated with the Agreement are incorporated within the provisions related to the manner in which the two countries cover the costs for admission of own citizens, transfer of third country citizen to the borders of the final destination country, transit through the territory of the admitting state, costs that are stemming from readmission of persons, provisions related to the manner of exchange and use of personal data, and provisions about the competent bodies for implementation of this Agreement.  c)  This Agreement was signed on 17.06.2004 and is still in procedure of ratification. It is expected that the Agreement will be ratified by the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia in the first quarter of 2005. AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Council of Ministers of the Republic of Albania on Co-operation in Combating Terrorism, Organised Crime, Illegal Trade with Narcotics, Psychotropic Substances and Precursors, Illegal Migration and Other Criminal Activities  a)    This Agreement regulates the cooperation between the competent bodies of the two countries on prevention, detection, suppression and prosecution of criminal offences in the field of: terrorism; organised crime; illegal production and trade with narcotic drugs, psychotropic substances and precursors; trafficking in human beings, children and human organs; illegal migration and; other types of severe crimes listed in the Agreement.  b)    The essential elements of this Agreement regulate the manner of carrying out the cooperation between competent bodies of the two countries, the actions of these competent bodies or other responsible ministries and bodies, the manner and conditions for data exchange and their use, the exchange of experts, documents and publications, which may assist in the process of prevention, detection and prosecution of the crimes of terrorism, organised crime, illegal production and trade with narcotics, psychotropic substances and precursors, trafficking in people, children and human organs and other types of criminal offences. c)    This Agreement was signed on 17.06.2004, and is currently in a procedure for ratification. The Agreement is expected to be ratified by the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia in the first quarter of 2005. 
PROTOCOL on Establishing Directions, Mode and Line of Co-operation in the field of Border Control and Illegal Migration Prevention, between the Ministry of the Interior of the Republic of Macedonia and the Ministry of Public Order of the Republic of Albania  a)  The Protocol regulates the mutual cooperation in the field of border control and the prevention of illegal crossing of the State border. b)  The essential elements define the areas of cooperation between the two countries, methods of cooperation, the ways of delivery and protection on exchange of information and determining the cases and the methods of ceasing the cooperation. In a view of resolving concrete issues, this Protocol foresees establishing of working bodies. c)  This Protocol is signed on 16.07.2000. It enters into force with its signing and is not subject to ratification. 
The Protocol between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Council of Ministers of the Republic of Albania on Opening New Border Crossing Points a)  The Protocol regulates the issues regarding opening of new border crossing points. b)  With this Protocol the parties have agreed on opening three border crossing points, one in the region of Ohrid Lake, one in the region of Prespa Lake and one near the city of Debar. In accordance with the Protocol, the border crossing points have already been opened. c)  This Protocol was signed on 12.12.1992. It is not subject to ratification. 
Preparation of the MEMORANDUM of Understanding between the Ministry of the Interior and the Ministry of Defence of the Republic of Macedonia and the Ministry of Public Order of the Republic of Albania in the field of Border Security is in its final phase a)  The Memorandum promotes the cooperation, partnership, mutual assistance and support in the field of border security.   b)  The Memorandum determines the aims of the cooperation, areas of cooperation, forms of cooperation such as exchange of information, education and training of border personnel on both sides of the border, organising joint actions and controls, as well as cooperation with the civil society and the local community in the border area regarding the crime prevention and suppression. c)  The Memorandum is expected to be concluded in the beginning of 2005. The Memorandum will be signed between the competent ministries of the two States. The issue regarding the level of signatories is not defined (minister, state secretary, director, undersecretary). It is not subject to ratification. 
Republic of Bulgaria The cooperation with the Republic of Bulgaria is implemented in accordance with the numerous  bilateral Agreements in different areas. The cooperation and activities between the parties in the field of border cooperation, and particularly in the area of maintenance, recovery and demarcation of the border line and border signage at the common border, is expected to gain on intensity during the next year. The border co-operation between the Republic of Macedonia and Republic of Bulgaria is carried out in accordance with the provisions of the following documents:  AGREEMENT between the Government of The Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Bulgaria on Measures for Prevention and Resolving the Border Incidents at the Macedonian-Bulgarian State Border   a)  This Agreement regulates the mutual cooperation in view of prevention and resolving the incidents at the common state border. b)  The essential  elements of the Agreement determine the actions considered to be border incidents, the manner for and bodies and instrument that will be employed to carry out the review, defining and resolving the incidents that might occur at Macedonian-Bulgarian State border. The Main Joint Macedonian-Bulgarian Committee for border incidents is established with the Agreement, as well as two Joint Sectorial Committees on border incidents, which hold regular meetings once a year.  c)  The Agreement was signed on 15.05.2000. It was ratified on 23.01.2002 and entered into force on 08.03.2002 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 13/2002). 

AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Bulgaria on Securing, Maintenance, Recovery and Demarcation of the Border Line and Border Signage at the Macedonian-Bulgarian State Border  a)  The Agreement regulates the issues pertaining to the manner of securing, maintenance, recovery and demarcation of the border line and border signage at the Macedonian-Bulgarian State border.  b)  Article 1 of the Agreement stipulates that the Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Bulgaria accept the state border between the Former SFRY and Republic of Bulgaria, in the part related to the delineation between the Republic of Macedonia and Republic of Bulgaria, which is established and described in the current bilateral an multilateral international treaties, and marked with border marks. The Agreement defines precisely the sectors at the Macedonian-Bulgarian border (the border is divided into two sectors), as well as which party is responsible for the maintenance of each sector. The Agreement regulates the manner of demarcation and the marks that are used for demarcation of the border, the manner of maintenance of the border marks, costs for their repair and recovery, as well as the procedure of regular review and inspection related to the maintenance and recovery.  For the purpose of achieving the set tasks, the Contracting Parties on the basis of this Agreement established a Joint Committee on Securing, Maintenance, Recovery and Demarcation of the Border Line and Border Signage at the Macedonian-Bulgarian State border. Its composition, tasks,  manner of communication and the manner for operation are precisely determined.  For the purpose of immediate actions on the ground, the Agreement also, foresees establishing of Joint Working Bodies. For the purpose of performance of other tasks, as well as for development of border documents, the Joint Committee may also establish a joint expert teams. The first meeting of the Joint Macedonian-Bulgarian Committee was held in November 2004. The activities of the Joint Committee on Securing, Maintenance, Recovery and Demarcation of the Border Line and Border Signage at the Macedonian-Bulgarian State border, and the activities of the Joint Working Bodies will be intensified in the course of 2005.  c)  This Agreement was signed on 15.05.2000. It was ratified on 23.01.2002 and entered into force on 08.03.2002 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 12/2002). 
AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of  Bulgaria on Opening Two New International Border Crossing Points between the Two Countries a)  The two countries, on the basis of this Agreement and for the purpose of strengthening and development of mutually useful and equal long-term cooperation and improvement of European and regional transport infrastructure, agreed on opening two new border crossing points.    b)  The essential elements of this Agreement bind the both parties to build, reconstruct and modernise the access road connections on their own territory. The exact point of intersection of the border line and the exact location of the both new border crossing points, as well as their technical parameters, will be established by the Joint Expert Committee. Thus far, the Joint Expert Committee held several working meetings where the coordinates of the intersection points between the axis of the road directions and the common state border are defined, and the technical elements of the road directions are harmonised. c)  This Agreement was signed on 14.06.1999. It was ratified on 14.07.1999 and entered into force on 13.09.1999 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 44/99). 
AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Bulgaria on Opening New International Border Crossing Point between the Two Countries a)  The two countries on the basis of this Agreement and for the purpose of strengthening and development of mutually useful and equal long-term cooperation and improvement of European and regional transport infrastructure agreed on opening a new border crossing point, Delevo-Nevestino.  b)  The essential elements of this Agreement bind both parties to build, reconstruct and modernise the access road connections on their own territory.  The exact point of intersection of the border line and the exact location of the new border crossing point, as well as their technical parameters, stations and types of freight and passengers, the regime of functioning, and all other issues will be established by the Joint Expert Committee. The Joint Expert Committee will be in charge for resolving disputes regarding the interpretation and implementation of the Agreement. If the Joint Committee can not suggest mutually acceptable solution, than the disputes will be solved by negotiations between the two Governments. Thus far, the Joint Expert Committee has established the intersection point at the state border between the two countries and the road direction, the location of the intersection point, the coordinates of the intersection and the location of the new border crossing point.  The Committee has also prepared a Protocol for performance of its tasks. c)  This Agreement was signed on 15.10.2004. In both countries the Agreement is in procedure of ratification. 
AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Bulgaria on International Road Transport a)  The Agreement regulates the road transport carried out by transporters, which are registered on the territory of one of the contracting parties, including the transit through their own territory, as well as through the territory of the other contracting Party. b)  The essential elements of this Agreement are incorporated in the section of: General provisions where the definitions regarding the area of road traffic are given, the part on Carriage of passengers, the part on Carriage of goods, the part which specifies the taxation procedure and the fees, the part on the weight, dimensions, equipment and other specifications, the part regulating the control, obligations for the transporters and sanctions, as well as the part on co-operation. c)  This Agreement was signed on 22.10.1999. It was ratified on 15.04.1999 and entered into force on 12.06.1999 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 23/99). 
AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Bulgaria on Regular Air Traffic a)  On the basis of this Agreement, and according to the Convention on International Civil Aviation, the regular air traffic between, and out of the territories of the two countries is established. b)  The essential elements are incorporated in the provisions regulating: the applicability of the Chicago Convention; awarding traffic rights; assigning of air-transporters and work permits; suspension and withdrawal; capacity; approval of flight time table; recognition of certificates and permits; exemption from customs and other duties; taxation; direct transit transport; tariffs; air safety and security; application of the laws and other regulations and procedures; transfer of net revenue; representation, trade and advertising; provision of statistical data; airport fees; dispute resolution and harmonisation with the multilateral conventions. This Agreement, as well as its amendments are registered in the Council of International Civil Aviation Organisation. c)  This Agreement is signed on 22.02.1999. It was ratified on 15.04.1999 and entered into force on 08.06.1999 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 23/99). 
AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Bulgaria on Interconnection of Railway Networks of the Two Countries. a)  The two countries, on the basis of this Agreement and for the purpose of continuation of the construction activities regarding Corridor 8, as well as reconstruction of the existing railway tracks, agreed on completing the construction of the rail track and interconnection of railway traffic between the Republic of Macedonia and Republic of Bulgaria.  b)  The essential elements of the Agreement regulate the methods of design and construction of new parts of the railway track and the reconstruction of the existing one, the methods of harmonisation and coordination of operations for the purpose of which, establishing of a Management Board is foreseen. The dynamics regarding the creation of a dynamic plan for building and other matters for construction of the rail track is also prescribed with this Agreement.  c)  This Agreement was signed on 12.03.1999. It was ratified on 20.05.1999 and entered into force on 23.06.1999 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 32/99). 
AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of  Republic of Bulgaria on Readmission of Persons with Illegal Stay  a)  The two countries, on the basis of the Agreement between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and Government of Republic of Bulgaria on Readmission of Persons with illegal stay, cooperate on a reciprocal basis in the procedure of readmission of persons illegally entering and residing in their territories, respectively.   b)  The essential elements of the Agreement regulate the procedure at the common border of the Republic of Macedonia and Republic of Bulgaria on handing over, admission and readmission of citizens of the two countries and aliens, as well as provisions governing the cases in which the two countries will permit a citizen of a third country to transit through their territory.  The other issues regulate the bearing of costs, providing information to the other Contracting Party required for the implementation of this Agreement, Bodies competent for enforcement of the Agreement, and the effect of the Agreement on the rights and obligations of either Contracting Party arising from other multilateral international treaties. c)  This Agreement was signed on 04.06.2001.It was ratified on 30.01.2002 and entered into force on 19.06.2002 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 12/2002). 
AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia  and Government of the Republic of  Bulgaria on Cooperation in Combating Terrorism, Organised Crime, Illegal Trade with Narcotics, Psychotropic Substances and Precursors, Illegal Migration and Other Criminal Offences a)  This Agreement regulates the cooperation between the competent bodies of the two countries on prevention, detection, suppression and prosecution for criminal offences in the field of: terrorism; organised crime; illegal production and trade with illegal narcotics, psychotropic substances and precursors; crimes against life, health, freedoms and rights of the citizens, private property, intermediation in prostitution and trafficking in people for the purpose of sexual exploitation; criminal offences related to the international trade and economic exchange and; other types of criminal offences listed in the Agreement.  b)  The essential elements of this Agreement regulate the forms of cooperation, the conditions and manner of delivery of information, materials, data and technical equipment in the process of implementation of this Agreement, protection of personal data, the persons assigned for contact with the other Contracting Party, the costs during the implementation of the Agreement and dispute resolution. c)  This Agreement was signed on 26.02.2002.  It was ratified on 24.01.2003 and entered into force on 26.02.2003 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 6/2003). 
Republic of Greece The cooperation with the Republic of Greece in the field of border management and cooperation was particularly strengthened by signing of the Interim Accord on 13.09.1995. On the basis of this Interim Accord, the parties confirmed their common existing frontier as permanent and inviolable international border, in particular by signing the Protocol for Border Cooperation on 23.06.1998 in Athens. Since 2000, the cooperation between the two countries in the field of border cooperation is characterised with frequent and constructive contacts, which resulted in concrete solutions.  
 INTERIM ACCORD a)  Upon entry into force of this Interim Accord, the Republic of Macedonia and the Republic of Greece, acknowledging the principles of the inviolability of frontiers and the territorial integrity of countries incorporated in the Final Act of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe, signed in Helsinki, and having in mind the provisions of the United Nations Charter, the Charter of Paris for a new Europe and their mutual interest in the maintenance of international peace and security, especially in the region, confirmed the existing frontier between them as an enduring international border.   b)  The essential elements of the Interim Accord are incorporated in the following sections: “Friendly Relations and Confidence-Building Measures”; “Human and Cultural Rights”; ”International, Multilateral and Regional Institutions”; “Treaty Relations” and; “Economic, Commercial, Environmental and Legal Relations”. In the section “Final clauses", the methods and principles governing mutual disputes resolution are given, as well as the entry into force and the manner of withdrawal from the Interim Accord. c)  The Interim Accord was signed on 13.09.1995. It was ratified on 09.10.1995 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 48/95). 
MEMORANDUM of Practical Measures regarding the Interim Accord between Republic of Macedonia and Hellenic Republic from 13.09.1995  a)  The two countries, according to this Memorandum and with an aim to put the Interim Accord into effect, agreed on certain number of concrete, practical measures. b)  The essential elements of this Memorandum elaborate: the Liaison Offices; movement of people and goods where the issue of visas is elaborated in more details; official communication between the two countries; mail; bank transactions; commercial documents; documents pertaining to bilateral road and railroad traffic; documents on transit transports and; issue of International Green Card for vehicle insurance. The two countries agreed on functioning of the road traffic of freight vehicles, bus round trip transport and freight rail transport, and on the issue regarding the transport means marks, including the aircrafts. c)  This Memorandum was signed on 13.10.1995. It is not subject to ratification and entered into force with its signing. 
PROTOCOL on Border Cooperation  a)  The two countries, on the basis of the Interim Accord, signed in New York on 13.10.1995 a Protocol on Border Cooperation. The provisions of this Protocol regulate all the affairs related to the common border, such as the issues of securing, maintenance, and recovery of the border line and border signage at the common state border,  and on alert, prevention and methods of investigating and resolving the border incidents.  b)  The essential elements of this Protocol stipulate that the Parties shall proceed on the basis of principle of reciprocity and according to the provisions of the Agreement between the Government of the FNR Yugoslavia and the Government of the Kingdom of Greece on securing, maintenance, and recovery of the border signage at the Yugoslav-Greek state border, and on alert, prevention, methods of investigating and resolving the border incidents, until  signing  of a bilateral agreement between the two countries. This Protocol regulates the issue of language use in the working documents of the Regular Joint Border Committee.  The first meeting of the Regular Joint Border Committee, between the two countries was held in Thessalonica in the period from 31.10.1995 to 03.11.1995.  Recently, the Regular Committee has been very active, and many meetings were held in friendly and constructive atmosphere, which resulted in concrete improvements. The regular cooperation will continue in the forthcoming period.  c)  This Protocol was signed on 23.06.1998. It is not subject to ratification and entered into force on the day of its signing. 
AGREEMENT between the Government of the FNR Yugoslavia and  the Government of the Kingdom of Greece on Securing, Maintenance, and Recovery of the Border Signage at the Yugoslavian-Greek State Border and on Alert, Prevention and the Method of Investigating and Resolving the Border Incidents  a)  This Agreement regulates the manner of demarcation of the border between the two states, on the land and the lake part of the border, the manner of recovery and maintenance of the border signage, as well as the manner of undertaking all the necessary measures for alert and prevention of reasons that might cause border incidents, and their resolution. b)  The essential elements of the Agreement define the sectors at the common border and precisely determine the meaning of border incident. The provisions of the Agreement also provide the establishing of Regular Joint Border Committee and define its main office, regulate methods of operation, competencies, method of decision-making, manner of crossing over the common border of the members of the Regular Committee in case of regular meetings of the Committee and organising irregular meetings. The provisions of the Agreement that provide for establishing of Sectorial Joint Border Committees, also define their competence, methods of operation, method of decision-making and manner of crossing over the common border of the members of the Committees and of the expert, technical and auxiliary personnel. The provisions of the Agreement stipulate which previous bilateral Agreements (Arrangements) and Conventions shall cease to apply by signing of this Agreement. c)  This Agreement was signed on 17.12.1958.  The Agreement is overtaken by way of succession from the former SFR Yugoslavia with the Protocol on Border Cooperation from 1998. 
PROTOCOL on Mutual Visa Regime and Fees  a)  In a view of regulating the visa regime between the two countries, both Parties have signed this Protocol within the Memorandum of Practical Measures related to the Interim Accord signed in New York, on 13.10.1995.   b)  The essential elements of the Protocol determine the types of visas issued at the border crossing points and respective fees, the types of visas that are issued by the Liaison Offices of the Contracting Parties, as well as by their diplomatic and consular missions abroad and respective fees, and the issue of visa issuing for the holders of diplomatic and official travel documents. The final provisions stipulate that the arrangements from the Protocol will be adapted to the obligations of the Republic of Greece, which stem from its membership of the European Union and the Schengen Convention. The obligations will be transferred to the Republic of Macedonia in due time. c)  This Protocol was signed on 20.10.1995. It is not subject to ratification and entered into force on the day of its signing. 
PROTOCOL on Amendments of the Protocol on Mutual Visa Regime and Fees (concluded in Athens, on 20.10.1995)  a)  The provisions of this Protocol amend the provisions of the Protocol on Mutual Visa Regime from 20.10.1995.   b)  The essential elements of the Protocol determine the types of visas issued at the border crossing points and respective fees, the types of visas that are issued by the Liaison Offices of the Contracting Parties, as well as by their diplomatic and consular missions abroad and respective fees. c)  This Protocol was signed on 02.02.1996.  It is not subject to ratification and entered into force with the day of its signing. 
State Union of Serbia and Montenegro  The cooperation between the two countries in the field of border cooperation is particularly strengthened with signing of the Agreement between the two countries on the Extend and Description of the State Border in February, 2001 The border between the two Republics of the Former SFRY until 1991 became a state border between the two countries. The delineation of the state border between the Republic of Macedonia and the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro started in September 2001 and it was the only state border of the Republic of Macedonia that was not marked. Thus far, the activities regarding the delineation of the border are developing continuously and with good pace on the both sides. The operation and activities regarding the delineation of the state border from the junction of three borders between the Republic of Macedonia, the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro and Republic of Bulgaria to the village of Lojane (where the part of the border with the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro towards Kosovo starts), is in its final phase and is expected to be finished by the beginning of the next year.  The Republic of Macedonia is interested in commencing, as soon as possible, the activities related to the delineation of the state border between Republic of Macedonia and the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro in the part towards Kosovo. It is expected that this process will be finished before the final decision on the status of Kosovo is made. The State Union of Serbia and Montenegro is successor of the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia.   AGREEMENT between the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia and the Republic of Macedonia concerning the Delineation and Description of the State Border  a)  According to this Treaty, the Republic of Macedonia and the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia (now State Union of Serbia and Montenegro), agreed on the delineation and description of the common State border.   b)  The essential elements of the Treaty are incorporated within the provisions defining the term state border, its delineation, and the method of demarcation of the state border. The integral parts of this Agreement are: the textual description of the delineation of the state border and a topographic map in a scale of 1: 25 000. The provisions of this Agreement prescribe that in a case of disagreement between the textual description and the topographic map, the textual description of the State border will be qualified. A Joint Committee on demarcation of the state border between the Republic of Macedonia and Federal Republic of Yugoslavia was established with the Agreement. A Rulebook on the Operation of the Committee, an Instruction on Demarcation of the State Border and a Technical Instruction on Creation of the Border Documentation, were enacted by the Joint Committee.  The inaugural meeting of the Joint Committee was held in March, 2002.  For the purpose of its performance, regular monthly meetings are being held.   The Agreement, also determines the manner of dispute resolution that may occur.  c)  This Agreement was signed on 23.02.2001. It was ratified on 01.03.2001 and entered into force on 16.06.2001 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 19/2001). 
PROTOCOL for Opening Border Crossing Points for Cross-Border Traffic between the Republic of Macedonia and the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro a)  According to this Protocol, the two countries, guided by the determination to regulate the cross-border traffic of the citizens from both border zones, and prevention of the organised crime and illegal crossings of the state border, agreed on opening four border crossing points for the purpose of cross-border traffic.  b)  The essential elements of this Protocol are incorporated in the provisions that determine which four new border crossing points will be opened, as well as the provisions, which prescribe that in the process of opening the border crossing points regarding the state border of the Republic of Macedonia and Kosovo (State Union of Serbia and Montenegro), and having in mind the Resolution 1244 of the UN Security Council, the two countries shall establish cooperation with the United Nations Interim Administration Mission in Kosovo (UNMIK). In accordance with the Protocol, a Memorandum on Defining Practical Details for Establishing of Border Crossing Points for cross-border traffic between the Governments of the Republic of Macedonia and the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro was signed on 22.05.2003. The Memorandum relates to the opening of two new border crossing points, from the junction of the three borders between the Republic of Macedonia, the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro and the Republic of Bulgaria to the part where the state border with the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro towards Kosovo starts.  The issues that regulate the traffic, development and enhancement of cooperation between the population in the border areas from both sides of the state border, the territorial application of the Protocol, the documents for crossing the state border and the regime of crossing over the State border in special circumstances are establish within the provisions of the Modalities for the Implementation of the Protocol for Border Traffic signed on 07.11.2003.   The Memorandum on Defining Practical Details for Establishing of Border Crossing Points for cross-border traffic foresees that for two border crossing points at the state border of the Republic of Macedonia and Kosovo (the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro), the representatives of the Republic of Macedonia and the Interim Administration, UNMIK shall create a document that will define the practical details. On the basis of this document, the Republic of Macedonia and the Interim Administration of UNMIK have prepared and signed, in a manner of exchange of letters, the Interim Protocol on Temporary Border Crossing Points, on 22.05.2003.  c)  This Protocol was signed on 29.03.2003.  It is not subject to ratification and entered into force with the day of its signing. 
AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Federal Government of the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia on International Road Transport of Passengers and Goods a) The provisions of this Agreement regulate the issue regarding the performance and enhancement of the international road transport of passengers and goods between the two countries, and the transit transport through their territories. b)  The essential elements of the Agreement are incorporated in the part on Introductory Provisions, in the part on Transport of Passengers an in the part on Other Provisions. d)  This Agreement was signed on 04.09.1996. It was ratified on 18.12.1996 and entered into force on 30.01.1997 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 69/96). 
AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Federal Government of the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia on Regular Air Traffic a)  The Agreement, according to the Convention on International Civil Aviation, regulates the issue of establishing of regular air traffic between the two countries and out of the territories of the two countries.   b)  The essential elements of the Agreement are incorporated in the provisions regulating the: awarding of rights; assigning air-transporters and issuing permits for performing air traffic; withdrawal or expiry of the permit; application of the laws, other regulations and procedures; recognition of certificates and permits; air traffic fees; exemption from custom and other import fees; direct transit transport; principles governing the performance of the agreed traffic; flight time table; air traffic tariffs; representative offices of the air-transporters; air safety and security; investigation of accidents; consultations; providing and submission of statistical data and; procedure on dispute resolution. This Agreement, as well as its amendments are being registered with the Council of International Civil Aviation Organisation. c)  This Agreement was signed on 04.09.1996. It was ratified on 18.12.1996 and entered into force on 31.01.1997 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 69/96). 
AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Federal Government of the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia on Regulation of Border Railroad Traffic a)  According to this Agreement, the two countries undertake the obligation that within their competencies, they will provide for regular and effective performance of the border railroad traffic.   b)  The essential elements of the Agreement are incorporated within the General Provisions and in the provisions regulating the: definition of terms; border crossing points; general provisions on border rail service and  the tariffs; criteria on cost calculation; border controls; maintenance of the  traffic safety and order on the border railroad tracks; legal assistance of the official personnel; crossing over the state border and staying on the territory of the other Contracting Party; official deliveries; mail service; post-office employees and their responsibility; means and the communication devices; customs; veterinary and phyto-sanitary service and; arbitration c)  This Agreement was signed on 04.09.1996.It was ratified on 18.12.1996 and entered into force on 05.08.1997 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 69/96). 
AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Federal Government of the Federal Republic of Yugoslavia on Removal of Visas a)  According to this Agreement, the both parties agreed on reciprocal removal of the visa policy.  b)  The essential elements of this Agreement are incorporated within the provisions in which the Parties agree that the citizens of the two countries, holders of valid travel documents, may enter without visas on the territory of the other Contracting Party at all border crossing points which are open for international traffic, and to stay there up to 90 days. The same is applicable to the holders of diplomatic and official passports and members of the diplomatic-consular mission or missions of the international organisation, for the duration of their mission. The citizens of one state - contracting party that intend to stay on the territory of  the other state-contracting party for the purpose of employment, performing certain profession, education, performing specialisation or scientific research, are obliged to obtain visa in advance from the diplomatic-consular office of that Contracting Party. c)  This Agreement was signed on 03.06.1997. It was ratified on 25.09.1997 and entered into force on 10.04.1998 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 50/97). 
Republic of Serbia MEMORANDUM between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Serbia on Cooperation in the Fight against Terrorism, Organised Crime, Illegal Trade with Narcotic Drugs, Psychotropic Substances and Precursor, Illegal Migration and Other Crimes a) This Memorandum between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Serbia regulates the cooperation between the competent bodies of the two countries on prevention, detection, suppression and prosecution of: criminal offences in the field of terrorism, organised crime, illegal production and trade with narcotics, psychotropic substances and precursors; crimes  against life, health, freedoms and rights of the citizens, the private property, intermediation in  prostitution, trafficking in people for the purpose of sexual exploitation; criminal offences related to the international trade and  economic exchange and; other types of crimes listed in the Agreement.  b)  The essential elements of this Memorandum are regulated with the  provision related to the subject of cooperation, competent bodies, areas of cooperation, forms of cooperation, conditions for realisation of the cooperation, refusal to respond positively to a request for cooperation, conditions and manner of delivery of confidential information, protection of personal data, assigning contact persons from both parties, costs during the implementation of the Memorandum, dispute resolution and the relation of this Memorandum to other international agreements. c)  This Memorandum was signed on 25.06.2003. It is not subject to ratification and entered into force with the day of its signing. 
Republic of Montenegro  AGREEMENT between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the Government of the Republic of Montenegro on Cooperation in the Fight Against Terrorism, Organised Crime, Illegal Trade with Narcotic Drugs, Psychotropic Substances and Precursor , Illegal Migration and Other Crimes a)  This Agreement regulates the cooperation between the competent bodies of the two countries on prevention, detection, suppression and prosecution of: criminal offences in the field of terrorism; organised crime; illegal production and trade with illegal narcotics, psychotropic substances and precursors; crimes against life, health, freedoms and rights of the citizens, private property, intermediation in  prostitution, trafficking in people for the purpose of sexual exploitation and; other types of crimes listed in the Agreement.  b)  The essential elements of this Memorandum are regulated with the provision related to the subject of cooperation, the competent bodies, areas of cooperation, forms of cooperation, conditions for realisation of the cooperation, refusal to respond positively to the request for cooperation, conditions and manner of delivery of confidential information, protection of personal data, assigning contact persons from both parties, costs during the implementation of the Memorandum, dispute resolution and relation of this Agreement to other international agreements.  c)  This Agreement was signed on 10.06.2003.  It is ratified by the Assembly of the Republic of Macedonia on 22.07.2003 (“Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 52/2003). The ratification of this Agreement by the Assembly of the Republic of Montenegro is pending. 
State Union of Serbia and Montenegro – Kosovo (Interim  Administration of the UN - UNMIK) The cooperation with the Interim Administration of UN for Kosovo-UNMIK is carried out in a spirit of mutual understanding  and trust, and in view of facilitating the free movement of the citizens of Kosovo, in and through the territory of the Republic of Macedonia, and for exercising of certain civil rights and interests before the state bodies of the Republic of Macedonia. In accordance with this determination, the Government of the Republic of Macedonia has enacted several decisions: Decision on Removal of Visas for the Citizens of Kosovo (State Union of Serbia and Montenegro), holders of travel documents issued by UNMIK, from June, 2002; Decision on Recognition of Licence Plates and Certificates of Title regarding Motor Vehicles Property of the Citizens of Kosovo (State Union of Serbia and Montenegro), issued by UNMIK, from July, 2002 and; Decision for Acceptance of Birth Certificates for the Citizens of Kosovo (State Union of Serbia and Montenegro), issued by the Interim Administration of UNMIK and Appropriate Registry Services and on the Basis of the Birth Registry, Marriage Registry and Death Registry from June, 2004.   The border cooperation between the Republic of Macedonia and the Interim Administration of the UN for Kosovo is being carried out pursuant to the provisions of:    INTERIM PROTOCOL on Temporary Border Crossing Points, Tanuševci- Debalde and Strezimir- Restelica a)  The provisions of the Interim Protocol define the procedures regarding the opening of two new temporary border crossing points aimed at: improving the economic activities of the population in the cross-border zone and near the two border crossing points; strengthening the cooperation between the Contracting Parties in the field of border control and strengthening the coordination in direction towards increasing the security and the rule of law. b)  The essential elements of the Interim Protocol regulate: areas covered by the temporary border crossing points; persons entitled to cross the state border at the temporary border crossing points; conditions for crossing over the state border at these border crossings; administration for regular operation of these temporary border crossings and mutual communication.   There are two Annexes (A and B) on the Interim Protocol, where the townships of both sides whose citizens may use the two border crossing points are listed.  c)  This is concluded in a manner of letter exchange on 22.05.2003. It is not subject to ratification and entered into force with the day of its signing. 
20. How is border management supported by intelligence? Competent institutions for intelligence support of the border management activities are the Ministry of the Interior and the Customs Administration. Within the Ministry of the Interior intelligence activities are undertaken at local, regional and central level.    In that respect, as a segment of the border management, an Intelligence Unit operates within the Operative Sector of the Border Police Department. This structure provides support for the border security with intelligence data, indications and reports on persons, groups or organisations from the country or abroad, for whom there is a well founded suspicion that they are included or are conducting intelligence, terrorist or other unconstitutional activities. The Intelligence Unit by using various intelligence, operative-technical methods and means collects data, indications and reports within the responsibility and of interest to the Border Police; processes them in a form of an intelligence product and distributes it to the competent bodies for timely planning and undertaking of respective operative measures and activities. At regional level, Intelligence Units are organised within the Regional centres. They are entrusted, with application of legal means and methods, to gather data, indications and reports and to distribute them to the already mentioned Unit within the Border Police Department.  Concerning the way of collecting information (according to the hierarchy) the initial data and indications are collected by the units for securing the state border – officers employed at the border crossing points and in the border police stations (at local level).  Having received the information, professional services conduct analysis and engage additional staff for elaboration and confirmation of these indications. Than they are distributed to the offices responsible for undertaking adequate measures i.e. prevention of expected border incidents. As a broad spectrum of information is in question, once the analysis is done, the information is then forwarded to the related intelligence services within other institutions in order to inform them or for undertaking measures within their competencies.  Due to the need to act in a joint and coordinated way with intelligence services from other state institutions with an aim to expose and prevent unconstitutional activities, besides exchange of intelligence data and information between intelligence units within related state services, there is also a need of exchange of these information with the intelligence services of the neighbouring countries. Thus, a part of the information is received from intelligence officers in the army and a part from the foreign intelligence services (on working meetings). The Sector for Control and Investigations within the Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia, through its Intelligence Unit provides the personnel on the border crossing points with intelligence information on suspected persons, freight vehiclescompanies and suspicious goods.   The Intelligence Unit within the Sector for Control and Investigations is responsible for collecting and distributing intelligence data from and to the border crossing points. Within the customs territory of the Republic of Macedonia which is divided in five regions, two teams of dispersed local intelligence officers (regions of Bitola and Gevgelija) are operating. Through this local intelligence officers or through the 24 hour Operational Centre, information related to illegal activities at the border crossing points are forwarded directly to the Unit for Incoming and Outgoing Intelligence Report Forms (and are accessible to the services of the law enforcement agencies and to the customs officers at the border crossing points). In the 24 hour Operational Centre an Open Customs Linehas been established. Using this line, citizens can provide information 24 hours a day, which are then simultaneously forwarded to competent offices for execution of operative actions. Certain operative information and actions are coordinated with other law enforcement agencies outside the Customs Administration and in the field of information exchange co-operation is established with the intelligence services of some of the neighbouring countries. 21. How is the gathering of information, its analysis and distribution arranged? The regional police units have a duty to enter data on perpetrated criminal offences and other illegal activities, as well as data on events of operative and security significance, into the central information system of the Ministry and to record a part of this data manually.  The gathering and processing of the data by Border Police stations and border crossing points is performed at local level and, after being processed, they are communicated to the regional and central level. At regional level, further processing and analysis of data is performed by professional services, which distribute these data to competent services at central level. In the same time the data are circulated to the local level, which provides for mutual exchange of information.  The finally processed data by the professional services at central level are distributed to the responsible services on central level, as well as on regional and local level, which provides for a continuous flow of information. The Border Police Department gathers and uses the information within the established reporting system of the Ministry of the Interior (for more details see answers 24_G_2024_G_2324_G_27). The internal act Instruction on Mandatory Reporting on Security Situations, Events and Incidents of Interest to the State, determines the security situations, events and incidents about which the regional organisational units of the Ministry of the Interior must inform the relevant services in the Ministry. The manner of reporting is also defined by this act. The processed data on security events within the central information system, can be presented for a period of three, six and nine months, as well as for a year. Subsequently, reports, analysis, reviews and other documents are prepared and further used to monitor the security situation in the country, aiming at prevention and detection of criminal offences and perpetrators.  Depending on the urgency of the information, the reporting is carried out through voice messages (telephone and radio systems) and non-voice messages (fax, e-mail and through system for transfer of protected messages). The form of the reporting can be a telegram, report, official note or information.  The distribution is a process of providing and submitting information and data to the final users, in a form understandable for the user, and in a time manner allowing the user to prepare and make the necessary decisions. The distribution is carried out through personal contacts and physical distribution of written materials, optical discs, floppy discs, fax messages, video tapes and various reports.  Within the distribution process, measures for protection of the confidentiality of information and data are used. In order to provide the fastest possible information dissemination and receiving of feedbacks and requests, the distribution process is constantly assessed and adapted according to the developments in this field. Exchange of data and information regarding the security of the state border in terms of prevention and detection of illegal activities, such as smuggling of arms or drugs, trafficking in human beings, etc. is performed regularly in coordination with the Ministry of Defence and the Customs Administration, after which measures for prevention and suppression of such activities are undertaken. Within the Ministry of Defence, the information and data of security and intelligence significance, from the structure of the border units are distributed to the Security Body or the G-2 structure in the Army of the Republic of Macedonia, and as a product they are communicated to the Sector for Security and Intelligence, where analyses are performed and the data are used for assessments on the need of certain security measures. On the basis of already analised risks, directions from the Sector for Security and Intelligence are delivered to the G-2 structure and the border units for undertaking of appropriate measures. Upon assessment and when needed, data are also exchanged with other security services in the state. In 2003, within the Customs Administration, a Control and Investigation Sector was established. In accordance with the recommendations of the European Commission CAFAO-МАК Mission, from the beginning of 2003 an Intelligence Unit is also operational. This Unit processes information related to illegal activities in transport and trade of goods. The information are gathered and distributed using special intelligence forms, designed for the law enforcement services, as well as for the customs officers in other units. The information from citizens related to trafficking and corruption are gathered through the open customs line within the 24 hour Operation Centre. Since 1998, Republic of Macedonia is a Member State of RILO (Regional Intelligence Liaison Office) for Eastern Europe and through CEN (Customs Enforcement Network) exchanges information and communication with other customs services and law enforcement services. The Customs Administration and the Ministry of the Interior, through their liaison officers at the SECI Regional Center for Combating Trans-border Crime in Bucharest, are exchanging relevant data and information by secure system. These data and information are related to different types of crime, such as human trafficking, arms and drugs trafficking, terrorism, financial crime and smuggling of excise goods and other commodities.   The Sector for Control and Investigations also participates in the information exchange using the information system BALKAN-INFO. This information system operates 24 hours and provides information regarding persons, companies, vehicles and freights under suspicion of illegal trafficking with narcotic substances. The information from this system, after their assessment and analysis are deposited in the Intelligence Database, within the Intelligence Unit, and depending on the type of information, are distributed to the competent services within the Customs Administration and other state bodies for further operational activities. The Intelligence Unit exchanges data and information with the neighbouring countries and with the liaison offices of regional nature. The data is analysed through analysis of information from the Intelligence Database, ASYCUDA – software for customs data processing and web sites of other relevant services and institutions. To perform certain strategic analysis the analytical software ANALYST NOTEBOOK is used.  22. Describe the means of providing situational awareness and reaction capability on green and blue borders. Is the level satisfactory in relation to the threat analysis? What would be major fields of development in this respect? The Border Police Department constantly maintains its situational awareness. The situational awareness is based on continuous monitoring and examination of the situation in the border area. These assessments are than aligned with the assessments of other authorities having competencies in securing the state border (Ministry of Defence, Ministry of Education and Science, Ministry of Foreign Affairs, Ministry of Finance - Customs Administration, Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Water Resources Management, Ministry of Environment and Physical Planning).  In general terms, the situational awareness by the Border Police has three elements: topographic - geographic assessment, tactical - operative assessment and security assessment.  The topographic-geographical assessment serves to analyse the general features of the geographic area such as relief, hydrographical and vegetation features of the border zone, demographic features and settlements, communications and their status, and finally economic features of the border zone.  In the context of tactical-operative assessment, analysis of forces that secure the border on the side of the neighbouring country and of potential routes favourable for illegal crossings and modes for their operative closure are made.  The security assessment analyses the population and facilities (economics, telecommunications, etc) which are located in the border area and might be potential targets for terrorist organisations.  The reaction capabilities of the Border Police on the green and blue border appropriate to the assessment of the situation are still modest, since the Border Police is in the process of equipping, in terms of personnel and technical facilities, motor vehicles and vessels necessary for efficient securing of the state border. Along the green border, the Border Police performs its responsibilities primarily by deploying ground patrols, while the surveillance equipment is outdated. However, in near future, after equipping the Border Police with modern technical surveillance equipment and motor vehicles, the securing of the state border will be performed using motor patrols, motorcycle patrols and motor sleigh patrols. The blue border, i.e. the state border on the three natural lakes is secured using vessels - equipped power boats. Power boats equipped with GPS and probes are used only at the Ohrid Lake and there is one coastline radar with an operational range of 4 km.  Based on the situational assessment and the threat analysis in securing the state border, the major fields of development would be:    Construction of a communication network to facilitate data transfer;    Equipping the Border Police with professional personnel;   Equipping the Border Police with sophisticated equipment for securing the state border;    Equipping the Border Police with motor vehicles and vessels;    Demarcation of the border line at the lakes with floating border marks (along the blue border);    Upgrading the infrastructure in the border areas.  
23. What equipment is available to the border guards? Is there any major lack of infrastructure or equipment as regards the arrangements for, or organisation of, border checks? At most of the border crossing points the Border Police has the following type of equipment:   Computers;  Passport readers;   Docu-tests, drug and explosive detectors;   Radioactive material detectors;   Cavity detecting devices;   Terminal links to the central information system of the Ministry of the Interior; In addition to these types of equipment, border crossing points for air traffic are also equipped with:    Hand metal detectors;   X-ray machines and metal detector doors; The border police stations, performing border surveillance have:   Passenger motor vehicles;   Terrain motor vehicles;   Vessels for surveillance of the blue border;   Optoelectronic devices for day and night surveillance; in special circumstances a helicopter, part of the Helicopter Unit of the Ministry of the Interior, is also used.  Most of the equipment available to the Border Police stations is outdated and insufficient. Border Police stations lack computer equipment, motor vehicles, vessels, opto-electronic devices for day and night surveillance, thermal detectors, etc.  With regards to the equipment in general terms the following types of equipment are lacking: central computer system links for prompt data exchange, CO2 detectors, sophisticated devices and equipment for securing the state border and for detection of falsified documents, etc.  There is also a need for certain improvements in the infrastructure, especially having in mind the fact that some of the objects at the border crossing points are pre-fabricated buildings.  For more details on the equipment see answer 24_A_27
24. Provide information about unauthorised border crossing points used for local traffic (precise areas). Pursuant to Article 9 of the Law on Crossing the State Border and Movement In the Border Zone (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, Nos 36/92, 66/92, 12/93, 15/93, 31/93, 11/94 and19/04), the border crossing points are established by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia, in accordance with the international agreements. Twenty (20) border crossing points are operational in the Republic of Macedonia.  Article 8 of the said Law stipulates: “A border crossing point may be open for international traffic, for interstate traffic and for local border traffic”.  Hence, in 2003 as a supplement to the National Strategy on Integrated Border Management, a classification of the border crossing points was introduced, defining them as first, second and third category of border crossing points.  The regime of crossing the state border of the Republic of Macedonia is regulated with the Law on Crossing the State Border and Movement in the Border Zone. Article 7 of this Law sets forth that the state border may be crossed only at authorised border crossing points, with a valid travel document and at times envisaged for traffic; this article furthermore stipulates that the border may be crossed outside the border crossing point only in cases of vis major or according to an international agreement.  Any crossing of the state border outside the border crossing points is considered as illegal, i.e. as an offence for which Article 66, paragraph 1, subparagraph 1 of the abovementioned Law sets forth an appropriate sanction.  Based on relevant information of the services that secure and control the state border, such points i.e. areas that are used as illegal border crossing points are:  1.  At the border with Republic of Greece 
  Location called KAROT, near border stone 51/13   KARABALIJA Mountain, near border stone 44   Village of NIKOLIK near Dojran Lake   Location  called ŽELEZNIKA PRUGA, near border stone 150   Location called CRKVICA, between border stone 119 to border stone 120   Location called KRIVI KAMEN - near border stone 167.  
2.  At the border with Republic of Bulgaria 
  Location called PLANINSKI VRV-RUEN, near border stone 91 called BEL KAMEN, between border stone 103 and border stone 104   Location called LUKOV RID, between border stone 70 and border stone 71   Location called ADŽIICA, between  border stone 32 and border stone 33   Location called RIBNIK, between border stone 14 and border stone 15.  
3.  At the border with the State Union of Serbia and Montenegro 
  Village of DLOBOICA (on the side of Serbia and Montenegro) -- Village of JAŽINCE (on the side of the Republic of Macedonia)    Village of DOLNO BLACE (on the side of the Republic of Macedonia) --Location called GENERAL JANKOVI (on the side of Serbia and Montenegro)    Village of TANUŠEVCI (on the side of the Republic of Macedonia) -- village of DEBALDE (on the side of Serbia and Montenegro)    Village of GOŠINCE (on the side of the Republic of Macedonia) -- village of STANKI (on the side of Serbia and Montenegro)    Village of LOJANE (on the side of the Republic of Macedonia) -- village of MIRATOVAC (on the side of Serbia and Montenegro)    Location called MALJOCKA KORIJA near the village of Sopot.  
4.   At the border  with Republic of Albania:  
  Location called RESTELICA (on the side of Serbia and Montenegro) – town of GOSTIVAR (on the side of the Republic of Macedonia) (near the tripartite border)   Village of KLOBOISTA (on the side of the Republic of Albania) -- village of SPAS (Republic of Macedonia)    Location called KRASATA BRDO (on the side of the Republic of Albania) – town of STRUGA (on the side of the Republic of Macedonia)    Location called ZAVOJ (Republic of Albania) – town of STRUGA (Republic of Macedonia)    Location called POGRADEC (on the side of the Republic of Albania) -- village of LJUBANIŠTA (on the side of the Republic of Macedonia)    Village of PEŠKOPEJA (on the side of the Republic of Albania) – village of LJUBANIŠTA (on the side of the Republic of Macedonia)   Along the Ohrid Lake near floating border marks No. 3 and 4.  Based on the above stated information about areas used as unauthorised border crossing points, the services that secure and control the state border (the Ministry of the Interior - Border Police Department, the Army of the Republic of Macedonia and the Customs Administration) undertake appropriate operative-tactical measures to prevent illegal crossings of the state border. 25. Which national databases and registers do you have in place (e.g. stolen vehicles, missing persons etc.)? The Ministry of the Interior keeps various types of registers related to matters within its competencies. Keeping of the registers is prescribed by laws and secondary legislation that regulate a specific field. In addition to these registers, the organisational units of the Border Police Department keep records in accordance with the Instruction Telegrams or Orders from relevant structures within the Ministry of the Interior.  In performing control of border crossing, the organisational units of the Border Police Department use the following registers:   Register of the number of persons and vehicles crossing the state border;    Register of persons and vehicles crossing the border with special freight vehicle documents;   Register of aircrafts taking-off and landing at airports;    Register of entry/exit of trains at border crossings for railway traffic;   Register of issued approvals for transfer of arms and ammunition across the territory of the Republic of Macedonia and register of hunting weapons ownership permits issued to persons coming to the Republic of Macedonia for hunting purposes and to members of foreign shooting organisations coming to the Republic of Macedonia at marksmanship competitions and preparations for such competitions;   Register of issued permits for movement and stay at border crossing points and permits for movement and stay outside the area of the border crossing points;    Register of issued permits for movement and stay inside the border zone;   Register of issued visas (issued at border crossing points);    Register of issued tourist passes;    Register of border incidents and other violations of the state border;    Register of persons, vehicles and objects subject to warrants of arrest, search circulars or notices;   Register of persons in respect of whom particular measures have been issued (control, search etc);    Register of international warrants for persons, vehicles and objects;    Register of foreign nationals with a ban on entry in the Republic of Macedonia;   Register of impounded and found objects;    Daily Register Book;   Register of unauthorised entry/exit of persons and vehicles;    Register of vehicles banned from traffic due to overload;   Register of the use of means of coercion;   Register of apprehended, detained and persons deprived of freedom;   Register of operative information;   Register Book;   Register of citizens who declared stay abroad for longer than three months;   Register of complaints by customers;    Register of entry/exit of vehicles transporting hazardous materials;   Register of entry/exit of vehicles transporting excise goods;   Register of issued travel documents;    Register of reported lost or missing travel documents;   Register of personal identification cards and citizenship of the Republic of Macedonia;   Register of registered vehicles;   Register of issued drivers’ licences;   Register of contacts with the border authorities of neighbouring countries;   Register of admitted-delivered persons following police procedures and upon commission confirmation;   Register of entry of damaged vehicles;   Register of operative action measures; In addition to the registers kept by the organisational units of the Border Police Department, the Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia also keeps registers on matters within its competencies. The Customs Administration uses the ASYCUDA application on customs operations within its customs information system (MACCIS). The reference data integrated in the system are: harmonised tariff system, applicants, companies, currency and exchange rate, customs warehouses, all reference lists related to the SAD (single administrative document) and data on all forms of customs procedure (export, import, transit, etc.). The registers also incorporate international standards and codes developed in the EU, World Customs Organisation and the United Nations. Furthermore, the system offers various possibilities and has been configured following the requirements of the Macedonian legislation in the specific area.  Pursuant to Article 48 of the Customs Administration Law (”Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, No. 46/2004) the Sector for Control and Investigation has the following databases:   Intelligence database;   Database on perpetrated criminal and minor offences;   Database on seizure of monetary assets and high-tariff goods, drugs and arms according to the CITES Conference. 
26. Describe your IT equipment and online connections at the borders. Are communication systems compatible with those used by neighbouring countries, and/or by EU Member States? At most of the road border crossing points and at the two air traffic border crossings there are LAN (local computer network) interconnected personal computers with passport readers, directly linked with the central computer system of the Ministry of the Interior.  Using special communication equipment a link between the border crossing points and the central computer system of the Ministry enables 24-hour access to the central databases with transfer rate of 2 Mbit/sec. The data transfer between the border crossing points and the central computer system is via data transfer channels leased from Macedonian Telecommunications (telecom operator). These computer networks offer the possibility to use text processors, and have a special application for registering and control of passengers and vehicles passing the border crossing points. However, the application is outdated and does not satisfy the requirements of the users. For that reason the entry of data on persons on whom arrest warrants have been issued and the storage of data on persons and vehicles passing specific border crossing point is done locally, at the border crossing points. The data are stored on the server at the border crossing points. Hence, there is no central database for all border crossing points.  At railway border crossing points and less frequent border crossing points there are local computer networks that are not linked to the central computer system of the Ministry of the Interior. The computer networks at these border crossing points are not equipped with passport readers. Therefore, the data on passengers and vehicles passing through the border crossing point is entered manually. The application for registering and control of passengers is the same as at the border crossing points for road and air traffic. The local and lake border crossing points are not equipped with computers and lack IT infrastructure.  The computer equipment installed at the border crossing points is in good condition and can support the use of much more sophisticated applicative solutions. The Border Police stations at the southern and at the eastern border have local computer networks, but are not interconnected, and there is no link between them and the central computer system of the Ministry of the Interior.  These computer networks enable the use of text processors and electronic communication, as well as the use of tools for spreadsheet operations and other calculations. The communication system, which is currently in use by the Border Police, is not compatible with the systems of the neighbouring countries or of the EU member-countries, while the telephone communication system is compatible and is in line with the EU standards.  The Customs Administration of the Republic of Macedonia has local computer networks at all road and railway border crossing points, at the two international airports and at the two international post offices. The provisional and lake border crossing points do not have IT equipment. The local networks are composed of servers, working stations, printers, document scanners and bar code readers. Computer equipped border crossing points process documents for international or national transit with the MACCIS computer system, based on the UN/UNCTAD software solution ASYCUDA. The application is based on the UN/EDIFACT standard and the ISO standards and represents a solid basis for exchange of data with the neighbouring countries. The local computer networks at the border crossing points are connected with the central database at the Customs Administration (with the exception of the Blato border crossing point, near Debar, on the border with the Republic of Albania). The data transfer rate is 64 Kbit/sec. The data transfer network of the Ministry of the Interior and the leased lines from the Macedonian Telecomunications, provide Internet access for the local working stations, enabling exchange of information (electronic mail). The network equipment provides voice transfer (VolP) which is currently not in use.  27. Which first and second-line equipment do you have in place at border-crossing points? Most border crossing points have the following types of first line equipment:    Terminal connections to the central information system of the Ministry of Interior which includes all relevant databases at national level;   Telecommunication equipment (telephone switchboards and Panasonic telephones);    Fujitsu-Siemens personal computers with passport readers and printers;   Docu-tests for document control with UV lamp and magnifying glass;   Portable UV lamps and magnifying glasses for document control;   Communication equipment (portable and stationary radio stations - Motorola GP- 300);   Portable equipment for detection of radioactive materials (at three border crossings).  Most border crossing points have the following type of second line equipment:    Drugs and explosive detectors – Ion tracer;   Cavity detection devices;   Portable metal detectors, metal detector doors and X-ray machines for luggage control – HAIMAN (at the airports);   Video cameras with recorders for control of the transport of passengers and vehicles;   Static detectors for radioactive radiation;  Fibrescopes;  Busters;   Mirrors with telescopic handle;   Laser devices for measuring distances;   Detectors for hidden goods;   Flashing stop batons;   Wheeled support devices and mirrors for vehicle control;   Sample taking rods;  Contraband detectors;  Photo-cameras;   Small and large tool sets.  
28. Do you have the capacity to secure machine-readability of new documents? In order to facilitate a prompt flow of passengers and vehicles at the border crossing points, at 16 of them (out of 20 in total) computer systems and travel document readers are installed. The readers are made by Rochford-Thompson, RDE 6701 model and are capable of reading travel documents manufactured in conformity with the ICAO standards. In 2002, under the CARDS programme, 50 new, more sophisticated travel document readers with scanners, of PD-150 B model were installed. However, due to the inappropriate software i.e. incompatibility of the passport control program with the readers these devices are still not operational. With the installation of a new passport control software (activities are already undertaken for its development) all passport control readers will be made operational.  
29. Describe what is done to detect falsified documents and in particular, to improve the exchange of information to combat counterfeit travel documents. The Border crossing points have at their disposal data on lost and missing travel documents that may be falsified, and as such used to enter or exit the country. Most of the border crossing points poses specimens of travel documents that are used for comparison in order to identify the falsified travel documents.  The border crossing points are equipped with technical devices, magnifying glasses and docu-tests that enable the border personnel to detect falsified travel documents at border crossing points.  The Forensic Department within the Ministry of the Interior provides expertise on suspectedly forged  travelling documents. Thereby the Department uses sophisticated equipment and expert personnel trained in documenting forgeries. Furthermore, this Department, based on the analysed data and know-how,  introduces the border personnel with new forms of forgery and  ways of their detection. In its work the Forensic Department co-operates with the services from the Border Police Department.  In this field the Border Police also cooperates with the Section for Criminal Police and in particular with the Department for Organised Crime which is directly responsible for undertaking investigative actions regarding detected forgeries. The basic police training for the Border Police personnel is conducted at the Police Academy, where they are gaining basic knowledge in the area oftravel documents, ways of their falsification and methodology of detection.  The additional training for the Border Police personnel, within the international police cooperation, consists of workshops and seminars for recognising and detection of falsified travel documents.   In the course of 2004, American and German experts conducted training for detection of  falsified travel documents for 50 policemen from the Border Police Department.  In cooperation with EUPOL PROXIMA, and with participation of German, French and Dutch experts several workshops for detecting falsified travel documents were organised for 228 policemen from the Border Police Department. Also supported by  EUPOL PROXIMA, a project  “The Way Forward“, as an advanced workshop for training trainers is underway.  The exchange of information on suppression of falsified travel documents is carried out through the Sector for International Police Cooperation, NCB (National Central Biro) Interpol Skopje, SECI Regional Centre for Combating Trans-border Crime in Romania where the Ministry of the Interior has a permanent representative, security officers in the Diplomatic consular  offices in the Republic of Macedonia and also through cooperation with the Border and Criminal Police Departments of other countries. The Ministry of the Interior is further strengthening and coordinating the cooperation with the countries in the region and broader. In this context, numerous agreements on co-operation regarding the area of falsified travel documents are concluded. In order to improve the efficiency in detecting falsified travel documents, additional sophisticated equipment for scanning and reading travel documents is needed.  
